At First Round Capital, we build and deliver dozens of products, services and events to our portfolio every year - and today I’m excited to announce our newest experiment hackPR entirely new way for press and startups to connect.  Through building, investing and supporting over 200 companies, we've seen the disconnect between reporters and startups countless times.  Reporters are constantly seeking interesting new people, companies and trends to cover – and I can’t tell you the number of times I’ve been contacted by a reporter/blogger asking me questions like “do you have any portfolio companies that have been sued for patent infringement” or “what are some crazy things that startup companies do to attract and retain good employees”.  And startups are always looking to connect with those same reporters.  These two parties often struggle to find each other and lack an efficient marketplace to connect.    hackPR is our attempt at creating a marketplace between press and startups. By giving reporters the tools to connect directly with companies and entrepreneurs, we hope to provide the means for more in-depth journalism while helping startups gain additional PR opportunities.  Here's how we think it will work:  A journalist will be able to send a request out to a range of startups based on size, sector or location with just a few clicks.  Their request could range from anything like "I'm doing a piece on collaborative consumption, what are the startups I should profile?" to "We're doing a piece on college recruiting in startups - have any great stories on how you won a candidate?" Based on profile data that startups will complete, the appropriate startups will be able to respond. If the journalist is interested, a match will be made – and the responses will be sent to the journalist The journalist will receive the contact information of the entrepreneur – and the reporter can make the decision to reach out or not.  (Since the startup will not get the reporters contact information, the reporter will not get spammed.) This service will be available to any venture backed startup – not just the First Round portfolio.   Like most marketplaces, scale matters and we think everyone will be better off  if it's an open platform.  This is not a new idea – there are other similar services like Profnet (which charges companies to participate) or HARO (which is not limited to startups).  But after using both of those services, I think there is real value that can be delivered by creating a platform exclusively for venture backed startups and the press that covers them…  We plan on launching the first iteration of hackPR in December 2012 – but be sure to grab your place in line as access will be opened very slowly to build the highest quality marketplace. We'll be aggressively iterating on our product as we approach launch – so if you're a startup or journalist, be sure to tell us what you'd like to see.  I strongly encourage any interested reporters or entrepreneurs to sign up at www.hackpr.co today to gain early access and help us beta test.  
 I was a dorm room entrepreneur.   I co-founded my first company, Infonautics, back in 1991 while I was a Junior at Penn.  By the time I (barely) graduated, we had 20 employees.  It was through this personal experience at Penn that I first learned that college campuses are wonderful ecosystems for creating disruptive ideas.  And I'm not the only one that noticed and took advantage of this.  For other examples, look no further than today’s largest tech companies -- it’s not surprising that Facebook, Microsoft, Dell, Yahoo, Google all started in a dorm room.   As I look at the environment facing today’s dorm room entrepreneurs, I notice a few things.  Never in history has it been cheaper or faster to start a company.  In my own startup career, the costs to get to “first product ship” went from $5 million in 1991 (Infonautics), to $2.5 million in 1999 (Half.com) and to $750,000 in 2004 (Turntide) – and that doesn’t even take into account the amazing strides and cost reduction platforms of open source software (mysql, memsql), flexible programming languages (python, ruby), cloud infrastructure (AWS, heroku) and new platforms (facebook, iOS6 and Android).   The result has been that products can come to market and create massive user engagement quicker than ever.  It took AOL 66 months to get to one million users.  eBay and Amazon did it in 24 months.  Foursquare in 13 months.  And Path in around 15 days!   But just because it takes less capital to build a company now, doesn’t mean it doesn’t take any.  And, for a student population already taking out five figure loans to pay for school, finding and obtaining that additional capital is often extremely difficult. Friends and family are usually stretched thin, and in most cases, already do whatever they can to ease the burden on their college relatives.  At the same time, we’ve seen the growth of many wonderful incubators and accelerators – but those often require a student to drop out (or take a “leave of absence” from college).  And traditional venture capitalists are not optimized to write $25K checks to fund a student’s idea while they are still in school.  We’ve heard from several entrepreneurs claiming that it was “much harder to raise our first $25,000 then our next $2 million”.  Given this, I just wonder how many amazing companies we would be talking about today had they received that first small check.  Instead, I hear stories about how amazing students, under the giant burden of college debt, abandoned their startup dreams and chose to take full-time positions at established companies.   Over the past few years we’ve invested in companies that are disrupting financial markets – from Upstart (which provides a revolutionary new way for college students to raise money to pursue their dreams) to Funders Club (which is pioneering an innovative way for startups to raise capital) to On Deck Capital (which uses technology and data exhaust to underwrite small business lending).  With these as inspiration, I spent some time thinking about how a new venture fund could bridge the disconnect between dorm room ideas and the capital to bring them to life.  In my opinion, a fund would:  Be run by students – not suits  A student investment team would know the entire student and campus ecosystem – allowing them to find, screen and invest in the best ideas  Be located on campus, so that it constantly has a feel for the vibe on campus  Students are engineers, marketers, financers, writers, doctors, lawyers and researchers – and allow them to focus on investing in companies that disrupt big markets that they (students) have expertise in   Finance students based on their needs.  Students are scrappy and often just need that first $10,000 - $20,000 in order to build their product and ship a minimum viable product – let’s call their current stage the dorm room stage That’s why, today, I’m excited to announce the launch of the first Dorm Room Fund, with a pilot in Philadelphia.  This isn’t a business plan competition.  It is a student run investment fund and First Round Capital will be committing $500,000 in capital (or $15,000 on average per Company) to the fund – for them to invest in startups that are founded by a current student at (or recent graduate of) a Philadelphia-based university (such as the University of Pennsylvania, Drexel, etc).  While First Round Capital will be the initial investor in the fund – and I’ll be helping them by serving as an advisor and member of the Investment Committee while they get it off the ground – our goal is to make this an independent, student-run fund…and for them to raise additional outside capital in the future.   We will be selecting the initial Investment Team of eight students – and our plan is that they will be responsible for selecting their replacements in the future.  If you are a Philadelphia –area student at Penn or Drexel, and if you are interested in applying to serve on the investment committee, please visit www.dormroomfund.com .  We’ll be holding an on-campus information session this Thursday (September 27th) and we'll email the details to every student who goes to the website and signs up.   While this is clearly a "pilot", if it's successful we expect (and hope) that Philadelphia will be the first of many cities where we bring the Dorm Room Fund.  And our hope is that this Dorm Room Fund allows for more companies to be built while providing an unparalleled learning experience for the students on the investment team.  Choosing Philadelphia as our first city underscores my commitment to creating a stronger and more vibrant Philadelphia start-up community.  Over the years, we’ve seen amazing companies make it out of Philadelphia’s dorm rooms (Invite Media, Milo and Warby Parker, to name a few), when the capital finds them.  And we can’t wait to add many more to this list. 
 For those of you who just want the punchline, First Round Capital is moving our headquarters from the suburbs of West Conshohocken to the City of Philadelphia  Here is why:  I’ve lived in the Philadelphia area for over 20 years – ever since I was a freshman at Penn.  I helped to found three startups in the Philly area.  I launched First Round Capital in the Philly area.   Yet, for most of my professional career I’ve been “bi-coastal”.   Recognizing that Silicon Valley is the center of the technology ecosystem, I’ve made countless trips out there.  I’m there so often that I know the flight attendants on the PHL-SFO flights by name.  It’s why this blog is called RedEyeVC – and why it has carried the subtitle “A view of the startup ecosystem from a coastally challenged VC”.   As a result, I’ve often found myself making a mental distinction between my “professional community” and my “personal community”.  Philly is where I live and socialize – and it is where my wife and I have chosen to raise our family.  But while I live in Philadelphia, First Round Capital is a national firm.  And as a result, I feel like I have stronger professional ties to San Francisco and New York (where we also have offices).   When I’m in Philly, I spend far more time talking to NY or SF-based entrepreneurs on the phone (and videoconference)  than I do meeting entrepreneurs face-to-face in my office.  And the First Round Capital portfolio reflects that – with over 80% of our portfolio companies based in either California or New York.  Over the years I’ve been contacted by many Philadelphia-based organizations that have sought to improve Philly’s tech ecosystem.  And while I’ve tried to help, it was always in a limited fashion.  I joined the boards of Innovation Philadelphia and the Wharton Entrepreneurial Center.  I’ve spoken at dozens of local events and met with hundreds of local entrepreneurs.  But I never picked up the “Philadelphia Tech” torch myself --  I always played a more supporting role…providing advice from the sidelines.   And when people have asked me “how do we make Philly more like Silicon Valley” I’ve always thought that was like someone saying “how can I make Philadelphia Chinatown more like China”.  Yet over the last few years, I’ve seen several encouraging changes.   First, I’ve seen capital get portable.  When I co-founded Infonautics back in the early 90’s there were several Silicon Valley venture capitalists who offered us term sheets on the condition that we move out west.  Yet today, capital is more geography agnostic.  With e-mail, instant messenger, skype, videoconferencing – and cloud-based reporting platforms that encourage transparency – distance doesn’t matter as much.  And like First Round Capital, more VCs are investing outside of their core geography.    Second, we’ve seen the growth of more efficient ways of knowledge transfer.  As recently as 10 years ago if you wanted to start a technology company, the only dedicated publications that catered to you were magazines such as Upside and the Red Herring.  And most startup knowledge was passed on from person to person – you learned from in-person interactions with other entrepreneurs and investors.   This created real network effects for technology ecosystems (like Silicon Valley).  Today, however, there are so many online resources to help people shorten their learning curve and build their own networks.  From Techcrunch (and their awesome Crunchbase) to PandoDaily (where I am an investor) to AllThingsD, it has never been easier to keep up to date on the industry.  Tools such as Angellist, Gust and FundersClub connect entrepreneurs to capital.  There are dozens of blogs written by venture capitalists and founders.  Online communities such as Hacker News have emerged.  And social media has made everyone and everything much more accessible.    Finally, it’s gotten much cheaper to start a company.  I (and hundreds of other people) have blogged about this before.  Five years ago if you wanted to build a mobile app you needed to plan on spending a year negotiating with AT&T and Verizon.  Today, anyone can build an app from their dorm room in a few days.    And as a result of these changes, I’ve seen more and more interesting startups get created in more and more diverse places.  Cities such as Boulder.  Austin.  Portland.  Providence.  And, yes, Philadelphia.  From Invite Media, Monetate, Curalate, Relay Network, PackLate, Solve Media and Warby Parker (which we were fortunate enough to invest in) to AdMob, Diapers.com, Milo, Venmo, DuckDuckGo and Lore (where we didn’t invest) we’ve begun to see more really exciting companies get their start in Philadelphia.   Every year I see more entrepreneurial activity at Philadelphia’s universities.  Indeed, just last week PandoDaily suggested that the University of Pennsylvania was like “the Stanford of the East”.  And we’ve also begun to see other positive signs in the ecosystem.  Grassroots organizations such as Philadelphia Startup Leaders (which I recently joined the board of) have emerged to provide some “connective glue” for the ecosystem.  Incubators like DreamIt and co-working spaces such as IndyHall, Venturef0rth, Benjamin's Desk, SeedPhilly, and many others have begun to emerge.  Several of our portfolio companies have already expanded into Philly – such as Uber and PublicStuff (which is powering Philadelphia’s mobile 311 app).  We’ve seen the launch of Philly tech blogs like Technically Philly.  And Mayor Nutter is a regular speaker at startup events (like Philly Tech Week) and a real booster for tech entrepreneurship.  Change doesn’t occur overnight.  I’m a big proponent of the what Fred Wilson calls “the Darwinian Evolution of Startup Hubs” – and recognize that in order for an ecosystem to grow you need the alumni from successful companies.  And while it takes multiple generations of successful companies to create a true startup hub, I’m encouraged by the quantity and quality of the current generation of startups.  Monetate, for example, employs over 100 people in the Phialdelphia area (and is looking to hire another 25 people now).  Their team is incredible -- and has the technical chops of a Silicon Valley company.  It isn’t random luck that the company’s founder and CEO, David Brussin, was the CTO and co-founder of Turntide – an earlier Philadelphia success story that sold to Symantec.  The best way to create a more vibrant startup ecosystem in Philadelphia is to help the current class of startups succeed – so that Monetate’s employees will be our next batch of upcoming entrepreneurs.  This doesn’t just create value today – but it also has a compounding effect as today’s successful companies create the next generation of entrepreneurs through their alumni.   That’s why I’m done sitting on the sidelines.  And so is First Round Capital.  And I am super-excited to announce that First Round Capital is moving our headquarters from the suburbs of West Conshohocken into the city of Philadelphia.   I’m trading my sterile suburban office park environment (and short commute) for proximity to Philadelphia’s entrepreneurs.   We’ll be opening a 10,000 square foot facility in University City – right next to Penn’s campus.  In addition to housing our Philadelphia team, the office will have space for startups – both for our portfolio companies (such as Uber’s Philly team, Curalate and Perceptual Networks) as well as other companies (like Technically Philly – who will be locating their offices there as well).  It will have space to host educational and networking events.  And it will have space for entrepreneurs to hang out and work.   But for me this is more than just an office move.  It is my acknowledgement that I can do more to help local entrepreneurs get their business off the ground.   And while I don’t expect that I will slow down my travel schedule or that our new office location will immediately result in us funding dozens of Philadelphia area companies – I do want to play a more active role in helping the current generation of Philadelphia entrepreneurs make their mark.  I’m not trying to turn Philadelphia into Silicon Valley (or Chinatown into China) – but I do think we can enable more great companies to be built here in Philadelphia.   And I can’t wait to get started. 
 $1 trillion.  A number we normally associate with national debt can now also be used to describe student debt, the result of an exponential increase in college tuition.  At current, two out of every three college students take out an average of $23,000 in college loans; loans that need to be repaid to the tune of hundreds of dollars a month upon graduation.  Add this to post-graduation ‘real-world’ expenses (such as apartment rent) and this is forcing graduating students to find alternative ways to save money, as some choose to move back in with their parents, or earn money, by forgoing their real passions and accepting a job for purely monetary reasons.  All of these financial constraints limit choices and dissuade risk-taking.     This is why I'm thrilled to share that our newest investment, Upstart, is looking to tackle this problem with an innovative new approach.   Upstart allows graduating students to raise capital in exchange for a modest share of their income over the following 10 years.  This means that students finally have the freedom to make the best choices for them, regardless of short-term income flow.  As the company writes:    Upstart was founded to help people do what they were meant to do. Many talented college grads take jobs they’re not excited about, rather than following their true passions. Whether constrained by debt or just comforted by traditional career options, too many students take the perceived “safe path.” Upstart aims to provide a modest amount of risk capital - where repayment is tied to the student’s future success - paired with guidance and support from experienced backers, to help grads pursue less traditional and more inspiring careers.  Upstart is launching with five pilot universities in the fall that include Dartmouth College and University of Michigan.  The Upstart team is comprised of a number of ex-Googlers and is being lead by Dave Girouard, who formerly lead all of Google Apps – so if you're a user of Gmail and Google Docs, you're familiar with his work.  Dave joins a number of other First Round Companies that are also shaking up the funding and financing landscape like On Deck Capital, BillFloat, AxialMarket, GiveForward, and FundersClub.  Please join me in welcoming Dave and Upstart into the First Round Capital portfolio and Community. 
 If we think back over the past decade, software has done a great job of making inefficient markets more accessible and efficient.  eBay made it easier for buyers and sellers to find and exchange products.  One of our portfolio companies, TaskRabbit, is creating a marketplace for labor that efficiently connects those who need tasks completed with those that can perform the work.  Kickstarter is enabling, and making it easier for, the world's most creative people to turn their dreams into reality.  But, software and the web have yet to make connecting private companies with seed-stage capital more efficient.  There are some burgeoning platforms, like AngelList and Gust, that are moving in this direction; but the transactions still happen offline,  and usually require large blocks of capital.  If someone is looking to invest $1,000 in a private company, it's still virtually impossible.  And as someone who spends over 30 hours a month on planes/trains, I know how hard it is for someone who doesn’t live in Silicon Valley full-time to stay connected and get access to the strongest startups.    For these reasons, I’m really excited to announce First Round Capital’s investment in FundersClub.  FundersClub makes it easy for companies to raise capital from individuals without hassle.  Companies have just one shareholder (the FundersClub fund) – and don’t have to deal with the hassles of chasing down individual shareholders for signatures/approvals down the road.  And for investors, it eliminates many of the monetary limitations - it allows investors to invest as little as $1,000 - as well as the geographic limitations of a normal seed stage round.  (You still need to be an accredited investor, though).  FundersClub just launched last week with several companies from the current batch of Y Combinator companies – and if history is any benchmark, the startups listed on the platform will be heavily oversubscribed shortly after YC Demo Day on August 21st.  What FundersClub provides for everyone, is insider access.  If you aren't one of the 300 people to get an invitation to YC demo day, this is your chance to invest in these great companies.  The initial available companies include FundersClub itself, Virool, Sponsorfied, TracksBy, and Coinbase.  
 ﻿Every day 149 million Americans (almost half of the U.S. population) take at least one prescription medication – with many taking more than one - and that does not even include the number of supplements/vitamins taken.  At the same time, approximately three out of four adults in the U.S. report not adhering to physician prescribed treatment regimens in one or more ways and almost half of adults report forgetting to take prescribed medication.  This means worse healthcare overall and leads to anywhere from $100 to $300 billion in cost to the system – we think a sufficiently large and hard problem.     This is why today I’m thrilled to announce our investment in Mango Health – an entirely new mobile solution for managing healthcare.  The team at Mango Health is trying to help consumers take control of their health with fun, elegant and easy to use mobile applications.  They’re attacking the problem of managing healthcare by focusing first on the drug adherence market with a simple and elegant mobile app that will incentivize users to take their medication on time, everyday, while also warning them about potential harmful interactions, thereby increasing their safety.    When we first met the team back in January, the first thing that impressed us about Jason Oberfest and Gerald Cheong was their passion for utilizingatheir social gaming background to make mobile healthcare more accessible and fun.  Before starting up, Jason served as a VP of Social Applications at ngmoco and SVP of Business Development at MySpace.  Gerald was the Lead Engineer at ngmoco, and has previous experience at VM Ware, Ariba and Microsoft Research.    Over the past year, we’ve continued to see incredible opportunities in healthcare that are fundamentally driven by both ubiquitous smartphone use, as well as a trend in consumers continued desire to be more active in their healthcare – and I can’t wait to share a few more investments in the coming weeks.  In addition, we’re starting to see the next generation of healthcare companies that can move at startup speed without the traditional multi-year build cycles that have been historically tied to anything in healthcare IT.   
 The more things change, the more they stay the same.  Today I’m happy to announce that we have successfully closed on our new fund (First Round Capital IV) – but we’ve chosen to keep our fund the same size as our last fund.   And we are thrilled that our investor base remains the same.  Every single one of our existing institutional Limited Partners has recommitted to our new fund – and we are honored and thankful for their continued support.  First Round Capital’s investment focus and strategy remains the same.  All we focus on is seed-stage.  We believe that the first 18-24 months of a company’s life are a special time – where the DNA of a company gets established.  And seed-stage is the only place we play.  It’s what we know.  It’s what we love.   We will continue to invest in services, products and events (like last week’s Advertising Summit) – building a platform that (we hope) makes it easier for entrepreneurs to start successful companies.  Our investment team, platform team and finance team is also staying the same.   I love the fact that I get to work with amazing people – who share my passion and excitement about working with amazing entrepreneurs.   And I’m super-excited to announce that Kent Goldman and Phin Barnes will become new Partners in our next fund. Both of them have done an incredible job for us and our founders.  They’ve helped us expand our footprint in New York and San Francisco, introducing First Round to many talented entrepreneurs and supporting our portfolio CEOs as board members and trusted advisors.  Each has played a meaningful role in our progress to date – and we are beyond thrilled to match their titles with the reality of their contributions.  We welcome them into the partnership…and look forward to seeing them sing and dance in next year’s holiday video! 
 I am very happy that the Senate approved the JOBS Act yesterday --  I supported it's passage and believe that it will ease the path for companies to go public faster in a way that maintains meaningful investor protection.   I am fully aware, however, that like all legislation, we will find both positive and negative "unintended consequences" the emerge from this legislation.  I believe (and hope) that those consequences will be better than the existing situation.  We have already witnessed the unintended consequences of Sarbanes Oxley on the startup industry.  There has been a lot of discussion about the decrease in overall IPO volume, the increase in the length of time a company waits before going public, and an increase in companies choosing to exit via M&A instead of IPO.  According to a Wall Street Journal editorial, SarbOx has "...managed to kill the creation of new public companies in the U.S., cripple the venture capital business, and damage entrepreneurship."  One consequence of SarbOx that I haven't seen widely discussed, however, is the impact that the reduction in IPO's has had on the public market investor.  As companies choose to go public later in their lifecycle, they have materially shifted the "value creation" from public shareholders to private shareholders.   When Cisco went public in 1990 it was worth $220M -- so the private investors (founders, employees, investors) benefited from the value creation from zero to $220M.  Today, however, Cisco has grown to be worth $110B -- an increase of 491 times their IPO price.  And public investors were able to benefit from the value creation from $220M to $110B.  This is important.  The public shareholder (if they were smart enough to buy Cisco during their IPO and hold it) would have had the same opportunity as anyone else (including the company's founder) to receive 99% of the economic benefit of Cisco's growth!      Take a look at 10 well known tech companies in the chart below -- which includes Apple, Amazon, eBay, Google, Microsoft and Yahoo.  The founders, employees and venture investors in these 10 companies benefited immensely from the creation of $32B of value at the time the companies went public.  However, the public markets (and public shareholders) were able to benefit from the increase in value from $32 billion to $1.3 trillion.  The public shareholder was able to participate in the creation of over One Trillion Dollars in market value creation -- and could enjoy the economic benefit of over 97% of the value creation from these companies.  And this is from just 10 companies!  If I wasn't so lazy, I could have included hundreds of companies in this analysis...but I'll leave that to others.  This is very different situation from today's crop of IPOs.  These companies have waited longer -- and are typically more mature at the time of their public offering.  And as a result, they are able to go public at much higher market capitalizations -- it is reported that Facebook will go public at a value of $100B.  In order for a public shareholder of Facebook to receive 97% of the economic value, Facebook would have to be worth over 3 trillion dollars.  But it's not just Facebook.  Twitter is reportedly trading at $8B in secondary market -- and LinkedIn and Zynga both went public with market capitalizations of $5+ Billion.  Groupon went public at a value of over $12B -- and most of the economic benefit from that value creation went to the company's founders, employees and investors...rather than their public shareholders.    One result of the shift towards later, larger IPOs has been the increase in secondary transactions -- allowing early shareholders to get liquidity before an IPO.  Indeed, there were reportedly over $800M of secondary transactions in Groupon -- and billions of dollars worth of shares have traded in Twitter and Facebook.    My point is not to debate whether today's companies are worth the prices they are getting -- I have no issue with a company selling stock to an educated, willing buyer at a high price.  Nor do I have any issue with secondary transactions.  Rather, I am just trying to point out that one major impact of the delay in IPO timing is that public investors miss the opportunity to benefit from what could potentially be the creatoin of trillions of dollars of market value.    I recognize that for every Yahoo there is a Lycos -- and for every Amazon there is a Pets.com.  And that by delaying a company's IPO, you are also protecting public investors from losing money in these failures (and shifting it to private investors, founders and employees).  But I'm not sure that was an intended consequence of SarbOx -- as the intent was to prevent investors from fraud, not to prevent them from making bad investment decisions...  One of the intended consequence of the JOBS Act is to make it easier for startup companies to go public.   And I hope that one of the unintended consequences of the bill will be to let public market investors benefit from more of the value that these companies create.   
 We've all had the experience -- we want to watch a video online, but have to watch some useless pre-roll video beforehand.   This often frustrates the user, doesn't deliver value to the brand, and reduces the consumer's perception of the publisher.    Finally, there's a new approach.  Created by Solve Media (a First Round Capital portfolio company), the folks that re-invented the captcha, comes a new approach to video advertising.   Instead of watching the whole pre-roll advertisement, consumers can type in a part of the brand message -- allowing them to access the content faster...and providing real engagement for the brands.  It's a simple solution adds real value for the industry and the consumer.  Video pre-roll advertising -- SOLVED. 
 Ever since I became a VC, one of the most frequent questions I get asked is: “Don’t you miss being an entrepreneur?  Will you ever do another startup?”   And I think my answer typically surprises people – because my answer to the question is always: “First Round Capital is a startup – it’s just a startup venture firm.”   Just like Half.com was started to capitalize on a gap between eBay and Amazon, First Round Capital was started back in 2004 to fill the gap between venture funds and angel investing.  I’ve often said how surprising it is that an industry that exists to support innovation and disruption has changed so little.  While there have been some really positive changes in the last few years, for the most part it seems that the biggest innovation in venture capital during the last forty years has been the increase in carried interest from 20% to 25%.   As a firm, we’ve tried to do things differently – and rethink traditional venture orthodoxy.  We’re stage specific (seed), distributed (with three offices), and active (we were the most active-seed fund last year).  We even hold our partner meetings on Thursday (gasp!) so that we have the ability to meet with almost any entrepreneur we want to on a Monday.     And while I’m super excited about the strength of our investment team, and the value we can add personally -- we’ve worked very hard to transform our portfolio of entrepreneurs from an unconnected group of companies working independently into a community of entrepreneurs who help each other.  We’ve invested heavily in building products, events and services to help our entrepreneurs help each other.    What began as a simple Yahoo Group email list for our CEOs six years ago has now grown into a full-fledged online network – we are one of the only venture funds I know that has full time engineers working on products for our entrepreneurs.  We hold more summits, workshops and dinners than most event planning companies.  And our Venture Concierge service has saved our CEOs hundreds of hours of time by providing them with a lightweight consulting/research service.   The reason we show up to work every day is to help amazing entrepreneurs succeed.  We want First Round to be a founders First Call .  And we try to provide our entrepreneurs  with assistance both from our investment professionals as well as from the First Round “platform”.  All of these platform initiatives don’t happen accidentally – they require a ton of investment and hard work.  That’s why I’m so excited to announce that Brett Berson has been promoted to serve as our Vice President of Platform.  Brett joined First Round Capital as an intern in 2008 (following in the footsteps of other FRC interns like Nat Turner, Jason Toff and Phin Barnes) and I don’t think he’s taken a day off since he joined.  As a former film-school graduate, Brett is the force behind our holiday videos and has helped us grow our platform initiatives from ideas on the back of a napkin to reality.  He doesn’t do this alone – he’s built a platform team of six amazing people.  And we all couldn’t be happier that Brett’s title reflects the reality of his contributions – and look forward to years of continued innovation with Brett leading the way…   
 After two years at First Round Capital, today Charlie O’Donnell announced he was leaving to launch his own seed-stage venture fund, Brooklyn Bridge Ventures - the first venture capital fund based in Brooklyn.  I’m really very excited for Charlie and can’t wait to see the impact his firm makes on the Brooklyn tech community.  When Charlie initially joined First Round Capital, we had both agreed that it would be for a one-year term.  After witnessing Charlie’s hustle and energy firsthand, we extended his position for a second year.  During his time at First Round, Charlie made a real impact -- helping us expand our New York presence (we now have an office on Union Square with three investment professionals – Howard, Chris and Phin), sourcing seven deals (including GroupMe, which was acquired by Skype), and placing over a dozen people in our portfolio companies.  On a personal level, I think that almost every blog post I wrote during the last year was a direct result of Charlie’s frequent barbs like “Hey, did you lose the password to your Typepad account?  How come you’re not blogging more.”  Ever since Charlie joined First Round Capital he and I have talked about his goal of starting his own firm one day – and I’m excited to see him take the plunge.  All of us at First Round wish him the best of luck and look forward to working together with him in his new fund.     
 Over the last few years, one of my favorite holiday traditions has been putting together First Round Capital's annual holiday video.  In the past we have used song, dance and our impressive physiques to work our way into your hearts over the holiday season. This year has gone by fast and we have added a whole new cast of remarkable characters to our community.  We are really inspired by our talented portfolio and lucky to be able to roll our sleeves up and deliver the 2011 edition of the First Round Holiday Video.       While it's not yet Friday…we hope it brings you a little holiday cheer.  (Although my kids are getting to the age where their Dad's performance in the video has shifted from "cool" towards "embarassing").     
 Over the years, we've met with thousands of entrepreneurs who were starting consumer Internet businesses.  And as we listen to them describe their business, I find myself categorizing the opportunity.  One of categorizations I've found most helpful has been to determine whether the company is looking to help people "save time" or help people "kill time".    Companies like Youtube and Zynga entertain people (and help them kill time)  -- while companies like Google, LinkedIn and Mint.com are great utilities and help people save time (but users rarely visit them for without intent or for for pure entertainment).  At First Round, we've funded both:  Mint.com, Uber, Xobni, and HotelTonight all fall in the "save time" category And StumbleUpon, MyYearbook, Roblox, MovieClips all fall in the "kill time" category Why create such a distinction?  Well, I think it is helpful in looking at how the businesses will operate -- and what metrics you care about.  It's much easier to measure the impact of a Kill Time company than a Save Time company.  For example, in a kill time company you'd really want to see strong DAU (daily active user) counts and really long session lengths.  Yet short session length might be a good sign in a "save time" company.   If it took longer for Google to answer your question -- and you spent more time on their site searching -- I don't think that Google would view that as successful.   The fact that Mint.com allows you to manage your finances quickly and easily is a good thing.    I think it's typically much harder (for me) to indentify which "kill time" companies will be successful at the seed stage.  The Kill Time companies are successful because they are able to entertain users -- and it's very tricky to identify good entertainment from a Powerpoint.   Save Time companies, on the other hand, are a little easier to evaluate pre-launch -- because these companies have a clear value proposition that can be measured in advance.  When we first heard of Uber, for example, we were able to understand the value propisition and user benefit immediately.   Finally, the monetization strategies of Kill Time companies typically require much larger customer bases / audiences to be successful.  These companies frequently monetize through advertising or low-price virtual transactions -- both of which require significant volume to generate meaningful revenues.    This is not intended to be a "perfect" framework -- and I can easily identify several exceptions -- yet I've found it helpful to keep in the back of my mind when I'm meeting with entrepreneurs.   (And there are rare times where companies can be in both categories.  Twitter is one such example.  There are use cases where Twitter can be the perfect way to kill time -- yet it has also become on of the most efficient ways for people to stay current on the news.) 
 Last week I posted some data from our portfolio about the pace of seed-stage financings.   And it sure looked like things are speeding up.  This week, I thought we'd take a look at the speed at which our companies generate revenue.   Specifically, we took a look at the 14 investments we made in our first fund (which was a 2005 vintage)...and wanted to know how many of them generated at least $250K in revenue in the 18 month period post-investment.  (I recognize that $250K and 18 months are arbitrary thresholds - but hey, we had to choose something).   And it turns out that just three of the fourteen companies in our 2005 fund (21% of the portfolio) generated revenues in excess of $250,000 during the 18 month period.  I was surprised to see how long it took those companies to generate revenue.  Especially because that fund has some really incredible companies in it.  It includes Bazaarvoice (who recently filed for an IPO ).  It includes SayMedia (formerly VideoEgg) who currently employs over 300 people in 10 different cities across the globe.  And it included Like.com (which was acquired by Google).  Then, we looked at the companies in our most recent fund (a 2010 vintage).  Specifically, we took a look at the 32 companies that have been in the fund for at least six months (since we didn't want to include the pre-launch companies we just funded).   And it turns out that 19 of the 32 companies in our most recent fund (around 60% of the portfolio) have already generated over $250K in revenues.  I was not expecting such a dramatic increase -- especially because while our fund size and investment team has increased over the years, our investment strategy has not.  Our average initial investment remains under $500,000.  We continue to invest in a company's first round of funding.  We still are focusing on capital-efficient internet startups.  So what's changed?  The numbers might influenced by the fact that we are bullish on online commerce -- and ecommerce companies typically have a shorter path to revenue.   It might be that the last six years have seen a dramatic growth in monetization platforms (whether it be advertising technologies, mobile platforms, virtual currencies, etc) that reduce the friction/cost/time to generate revenues.  It might be because the cost and technical complexity to start a company has decreased so much, companies today are able to get to market much faster (and possibly raise money much later) than they previously did.  It also could be that First Round has just gotten better at investment selection (though given the size of our woulda coulda shoulda list, I'm not too sure about that -- and I'm also not aware of any data that shows that a company's time to revenue generation corresponds to the size of a company's success).  Whatever the reason, I was surprised to see that companies today are 3 times more likely to get to $250K in revenue during an eighteen month period than they were six years ago.   Disclaimer - these results are based on a small sample that only consisted of one fund's experiences.  This post is not intended to claim statistical significance -- just an observation of what we're seeing in our fund.    
 I rarely (or never) post about politics here.  However, today Congress holds hearings on a bill that would create the "first American Internet censorship system".  This bill is being rushed through Congress without any input from the technology industry -- yet it poses major risks to free speech online...  And could prevent the next Youtube, Facebook, or Tumblr from getting off the ground.  Please watch the video below, read more about the proposed law (Brad Burnham has a wonderful blog post about this today), and make your voice heard by visiting American Censorship Day today.    UPDATE:  If you have five minutes and want to make your voice heard, click here and this cool Tumblr app will automatically put you in touch with your local congressman.     
 I've previously shared some of my thoughts on ecommerce.   Specifically, that there is the potential for massive disruption in ecommerce due to the explosion in interesting technologies and opportunities such as mobile, social networks, user generated content, virtual goods, etc.  One of the areas that First Round Capital has spent a lot of time looking at is subscription commerce.  We've seen that consumers crave curation -- and are willing to pay for a monthly subscription to receive items (sight unseen) that are curated by trusted experts/brands.   Two companies in our portfolio, Birchbox and Foodzie, are pioneers of this model...delivering a "wow experience" on a monthly basis to tens of thousands of happy customers.    Today I'm excited to announce that First Round Capital has invested in a new company: Kiwi Crate.  Kiwi Crate is a monthly service that delivers monthly craft projects that spark creativity and curiosity for kids aged 3-6.  As a parent myself, I love spending time doing hands-on activities with my kids -- but rarely have the time (or talent) to invent new projects and shop for the supplies.  As a Kiwi Crate subscriber you don't need to worry about that.  You'll receive a monthly package with several projects that you can do with your kids without preparation or hassle.    If you have young kids and are interested in trying out Kiwi Crate, feel free to use promo code FLYKIWIS3 for 50% off the first 3 months of a monthly subscription or FLYKIWIG15 for $15 off any gift subscription.  As I look at the growth in subscription commerce, I'm reminded how far we've come since this Everyone Loves Raymond episode aired:   
 I find it funny that Reed Hasting's letter about splitting up Netflix's DVD-by mail and streaming services could have worked perfectly for AOL's decision to split up blogging and investing.    Courtesy of "find and replace" here is the letter Arrington would have written...     I messed up. I owe everyone an explanation.  It is clear from the feedback over the past two months that many members felt we lacked respect and humility in the way we announced the separation of blogging and investing. That was certainly not our intent, and I offer my sincere apology. I’ll try to explain how this happened.  For the past five years, my greatest fear at Techcrunch has been that I wouldn't make the leap from success in blogging to success in investing. Most companies that are great at something – like AOL dialup or Borders bookstores – do not become great at new things people want (investing for me) because they are afraid to hurt their initial business. Eventually these companies realize their error of not focusing enough on the new thing, and then the company fights desperately and hopelessly to recover. Companies rarely die from moving too fast, and they frequently die from moving too slowly.  When Techcrunch is evolving rapidly, however, I needed to be extra-communicative. This is the key thing I got wrong.  In hindsight, I slid into arrogance based upon past success. We have done very well for a long time by steadily improving our blogging, without doing much CEO communication. But now I see that given the huge changes we have been recently making, I should have personally given a full justification to our readers of why we are separating blogging and investing.  It wouldn’t have changed the decision, but it would have been the right thing to do.  So here is what we are doing and why:  Many readers love our blog, as I do, because we aim to be the news source of record for tech startups.   We want to advertise the breadth of our incredible startup offerings so that as many people as possible know what exists, and it is a great option for those who want the huge and comprehensive selection of news coverage.  Blogs may not last forever, but we want it to last as long as possible.  I also love investing in startups because it is integrated into my bank account. The benefits of investing are really quite different from the benefits of blogging.  I feel we need to focus on rapid investment as technology and the market evolve, without having to maintain the impartiality of our blog.  So we realized that investing and blogging are becoming two quite different businesses, with very different cost structures, different benefits that need to be marketed differently, and we need to let each grow and operate independently. It’s hard for me to write this after over 10 years of blogging with pride, but we think it is necessary and best: In a few weeks, we will rename our blog to “Crunchster”.  We chose the name Crunchster because it refers to quick delivery. We will keep the name “Crunchfund” for investing.  Crunchster will be the same website and blog that everyone is used to. It is just a new name, and readers will go to crunchster.com to access their news.  One improvement we will make at launch is to add video games coverage.  Readers have been asking for video games for many years, and now that the blog has its own team, we are finally getting it done. Other improvements will follow.  Another advantage of separate websites is simplicity for our readers.  Each website will be focused on just one thing (blogging or investments) and will be even easier to use. A negative of the renaming and separation is that the Crunchster.com and Crunchfund.com websites will not be integrated. So if we highly rate or review a startup on Crunchster, it doesn’t show up in the Crunchfund portfolio, and vice-versa.  Erick Schonfeld, who has been working on our blog for years will be the Editor in Chief of Crunchster.  We will let you know in a few weeks when the Crunchster.com website is up and ready. It is merely a renamed version of the Techcrunch blog, but with the addition of video games.    For me the Techcrunch website has always been a source of joy. The new website is still that distinctive green, but now it will have a Crunchster logo. I know that logo will grow on me over time, but still, it is hard. I imagine it will be the same for many of you. We’ll also return to marketing our blog, with its amazing coverage, now with the Crunchster brand.  Some members will likely feel that we shouldn’t split the businesses, and that we shouldn’t rename our blog. Our view is with this split of the businesses, we will be better at investing, and we will be better at blogging. It is possible we are moving too fast – it is hard to say. But going forward, Crunchster will continue to run the best tech blogging service ever, throughout the United States. Crunchfund will offer the best investment fund for tech startups, hopefully on a global basis. The additional investments we have coming in the next few months is substantial, and we are always working to improve our portfolio further.  I want to acknowledge and thank our many readers that stuck with us, and to apologize again to those members, both current and former, who felt we treated them thoughtlessly.  Both the Crunchster and Crunchfund teams will work hard to regain your trust.  We know it will not be overnight. Actions speak louder than words. But words help people to understand actions.   
 Investing in the earliest stage of startups is difficult.  At the stage we see companies, it is often with incomplete ideas, incomplete teams and incomplete business models.  While we try our best to predict the future, we are often wrong.    Yesterday Business Insider published a story about "How Twitter Was Founded" that discussed the history of Odeo and Twitter.  First Round Capital was an investor in Odeo -- and I blogged about it almost six years ago when I wrote:  The reason I invested in Odeo in the first place was because I wanted to make a bet on Evan – and his recent actions have shown me how right I was.  I continue to be a huge “Evan fan” – and should he decide to raise outside capital again, I hope to be his first phone call.    After Odeo, I kept in touch with Ev and Jack.  I was an early user and big fan of Twitter.  And we offered them a term sheet to fund Twitter in April of 2007 (I believe it was their first).  They turned it down because Ev wanted to keep self-funding the company.  A few months later, when they had term sheets for their Series A round, Ev asked us if we wanted to participate.  And I declined -- mainly because the pre-money valuation was 4x larger than the terms we offered them a few months prior and 2x larger than any other investment we had made.  Big mistake.    We learned a lot from our mistake with Twitter.  While we still believe that valuation matters (and more on that in another blog post), we learned (1) how important a really strong team is , (2) that real market traction is worth a premium.   Thankfully we were able to apply those lessons when Jack founded Square and let us invest in his first round (at what the time everyone thought was a premium price -- but today seems like a bargain).  The venture business is humbling business.  Every firm has their "anti-portfolio" -- but few publish them.   We have our woulda coulda shoulda list - and Twitter is amongst the top companies (alongside Dropbox and Zynga).    When Nicholas Carlson called me for his story about Odeo I chose not to participate -- and told him I would prefer not to have the story published.   Not because Ev made any mistake.  But because I did.  I passed on Twitter.  And if that story was going to be told publicly – I wanted to be the one to do it.  Ev has been nothing but straightforward, honest and direct with me.  I think he deserves all of his success.  I stand by everything I wrote in my blog post from 2006.  And if Ev does end up starting a new company, I still hope to get a call from him.  I promise I won't blow it this time :-)   
 In the past we have wrapped our annual holiday greeting in song and dance. This year we have enveloped our yuletide message of holiday joy in the creative passion of the entrepreneurs we have been lucky enough to meet over the past six years.              We are honored to play a small part in the success of the brightest founders with the biggest ideas; to work together, to laugh together and to shower together...   Wishing all of the internet dreamers a very Happy Holiday Season!    
 Six years ago this month, First Round Capital was started.    It started with a simple thought – that while the world had changed tremendously over the last 30 years, the venture capital industry had not .  So we asked ourselves a simple question - what would a venture fund look like if the model was invented in 2005 rather than 1975?    And over the last six years, we’ve learned several things:  That a small fund size is good and brings alignment.  Alignment between investors and entrepreneurs.  Alignment between GPs and LPs.  Alignment with the market’s current exit realities. That the advent of email, IM, skype and air travel has made the country (if not the world) flat.  And while there are massive benefits to scaling/growing companies in a handful of ecosystems, there are amazingly talented entrepreneurs founding companies all over the country (like Eric and Susan Koger who founded Modcloth in Pittsburgh, like Garrett Camp who co-founded StumbleUpon in Calgary, and like Jimmy Wales who founded Wikia in Florida).   That with the right level of investment, nurturing and tools, you can transform a portfolio of companies into a community of entrepreneurs. That the entrepreneur is the customer – that successful investors exist to serve entrepreneurs, and not vice versa. That you can’t take yourselves too seriously Over the years, First Round Capital has evolved.  We’ve become one of the most active seed-stage investors with the most visited VC website in the country.  However, we have not changed our investment style or strategy.  We still fund Powerpoints (though more Keynotes these days).   We still fund pre-launch, pre-revenue ideas.  And, despite our growth, we have not really increased our average initial investment size.  We still make investments as low as $50K.  Our average initial investment size is still under $500K -- and we have never made an initial investment larger than $1M.     This week we successfully closed our third fund – First Round Capital III.  And we decided to keep it at the same size as our prior fund.   While it might be small by market standards, we think our fund size is ideally suited for our strategy.   Over the last several years, First Round Capital has also grown our geographic footprint.  Our investment team has grown from Howard and myself working in Philadelphia to an 8 person investment team working out of three cities.  Our San Francisco office, led by my partner Rob Hayes, continues to be our most active office – with over half of our portfolio based in California.    Rob is joined by Kent Goldman and with Christine’s  recent departure for Intel we are seeking to grow our west-coast presence by adding a  SF-based Associate.   (If you’re interested in the position, please reach out to Rob Hayes with why you think you might be a good fit).  Just last year we opened our New York City office.  We did so because we continued to meet more and more amazing entrepreneurs from New York.   Over the last three years around a third of our new investments have been based out of New York – and we currently have an amazing portfolio over 25 NY-based companies.  Our New York office is led by my partners Howard Morgan and Chris Fralic.  And today I’m excited to announce that Phin Barnes (who previously has worked out of our Philadelphia office) is swapping Amtrak for the L-train and is moving his family to New York.  And that that Charlie O’Donnell is being promoted from an EIR role to Principal.   I continue to be based out of Philadelphia (along with my colleague, Scooter -- aka Brett Berson) but will continue the lifestyle of a redeye VC – dividing my time  between Philadelphia (where my home is), San Francisco (where my true inner-geek lives), and New York (where the Shake Shack is).    As we approach Thanksgiving, I realize that I have so much to be thankful for.  I have the best job in the world.  I get to work with an amazing group of people – and get to spend my time with an amazing group of entrepreneurs.   I work with people who are trying to change the world.   And I can’t wait to see what the world looks like in another six years…   
 Over the last six years, we have tried to build First Round Capital as a community of entrepreneurs -- not a collection of companies.  We've always tried to find ways for our entrepreneurs to benefit from (and help) each other.  We've invested heavily in building this community.  We get all our CEO's together at our CEO Summits.  We hold portfolio-only conferences for our advertising, e-commerce and entertainment companies.  We have active mailing lists for our entrepreneurs to send questions, thoughts and suggestions to each other.   We even set up an Exchange Fund where qualified First Round Capital entrepreneurs can contribute a small piece of the stock they own in their company -- and share in the performance of all the other companies in the fund.    And during that journey, we have assembled a diverse group of innovators all on a mission to build something massive.  Some have PHDs from the most prestigious universities in the world and others haven't gone to college.  Many have built successful businesses in the past and for some, this is their first time.  Some have a background in engineering or product management while others built world-class sales and business development teams.  One got suspended from high-school for hacking into the school's phone system, while another has commandeered The Cone of Silence.  Some are incredibly young while others are…less young.  And we're lucky to have entrepreneurs from almost every corner of the world working at startups across the country. Yet, until now this community of innovators was hidden on our website.  So I'm super-excited to unveil the new Community section on the First Round Capital site -- a place to see the faces, biographies and Tweets from the remarkable people that make up our community. 
 If day's could have a "like" button, I definitely would push it today.  An exit to Facebook. Two women First Round Capital founders on the cover of Entrepreneur Magazine. And an exit to Google just in time for cocktails.  Just another Friday at First Round Capital.  In the short-term gains category, congratulations to Justin and the HotPotato team.  While we've only been investors for a few months, it's been a real pleasure to see the HotPotato team in action -- and I'm sure they'll do amazing things at Facebook.  In the long-term gains category, I've now been working with Munjal Shah for almost six years.  Back in December of 2004, Munjal first sent me his plan for a photo-site code-named Chunky.com.  That company evolved into Ojos.  Which evolved into Riya.  Which evolved into Like.com.  Munjal is truly a heat-seeking missile -- he has an innate ability to collect a massive amount of data and determine the signal from the noise.  I've blogged about Munjal's journey before -- but it's not nearly as powerful as hearing Munjal talk about some of his lessons learned in this video.  This is our second exit to Google this summer -- and Google is getting an amazing team of folks.  Congratulations to Munjal, Burak, Gaurav, Vinnet and the entire Like.com team!  Finally, I'm super excited to see two of our female entrepreneurs gracing the cover of this month's Entrepreneur magazine.  Both Emily and Susan created their companies out of their personal passions and experiences.  Emily (the co-founder of Foodzie) was working as a brand manager at The Fresh Market and saw firsthand how hard it was for small producers to break into big retailers, even with their awesome stories and top-quality products. So she created a place in which producers could directly connect with customers.  And when Susan (the founder of ModCloth) was in high-school, she spent weekends thrift shopping for unique vintage finds. She found herself snatching up great pieces that weren't necessarily her size, but that she couldn't pass up.  So, at 17-years old, she decided to start an online shop.  Today Modcloth is one of the biggest online retailers of vintage-inspired clothing, with hundreds of employees...  I sure can't wait until next Friday! 
 It's been almost five years since I went to Typepad and created this blog.  And while I've added content over the years -- the look of the blog hasn't changed.  Until today.  Today I launched a redesigned blog -- with a completely new design.  I've also taken off a bunch of the peripheral "widgets" -- which, hopefully, will make it faster to load and easier to read.   The new look gives me added incentive to add some new content.  So stay tuned...  Thanks to Brett Berson for leading the effort, Philly's own Brian Hoff for the wonderful design -- and the folks at Typepad for helping me with the upgrade! 
 As a seed-stage investor, First Round Capital typically funds powerpoints.  Not only are the majority of our investments pre-revenue, but most of the time we are investing in pre-launch companies.  While these companies might have an alpha/beta version of their site, it's usually early enough that we can’t base our investment decision off of any market traction.  Instead, we typically make our investment decisions based on three key areas:  the size of the market, the strength of the team, and the product vision.   This is often made even more difficult by the fact that we know that many of the businesses we fund end up with (one or more) pivots -- since their business plan is always wrong.   The Team  I've lately started to realize that our most successful companies are led by entrepreneurs who have a unique talent -- they are heat seeking missiles.  It doesn't matter where the missile is aimed pre-launch.  Successful entrepreneurs are constantly collecting data -- and constantly looking for bigger and better targets, adjusting course if necessary.  And when they find their target, they're able to lock-onto it -- regardless of how crowded the space becomes.  When Nat and Zach first came to us with the idea for Invite Media, it was focused on algorithms for ad targeting.  But once they got into the market the team saw a bigger opportunity -- the DSP space -- and they locked-onto that target with a successful outcome.  We funded VideoEgg back in 2005 with the goal of creating tools to manage online video -- but Matt and team quickly adjusted course and have now become a leading media network for brand advertisers.    When we first met Lance and Jia in 2006, they had a cool photo-hosting application called RockMySpace -- but they quickly found  the opportunity was much larger than photo-hosting, and RockYou has since became a leading provider of social networking and gaming applications.  Market  Markets really matter.  Because the bigger the market, the more targets there are for the missile to hit.  I've seen many companies fail to reach their potential because -- despite the skill of the founders -- they ultimately realize that there just aren't enough (or any) big targets for them to lock-onto.  It's really hard to start a company -- and there are so many risks that all startups share, regardless of market size.  Whether you're targeting a $10M addressable market or a $1B addressable market, you're still going to face Hiring Risk, Marketing Risk, Competitive Risk, Technology Risk, and  Financing Risk.   And while bigger markets might pose more challenges than smaller markets, the risks involved in targetting a $1B market are not 100x greater than those involved in $10M market.  Choosing the right market is critical, because the market you choose determines the targets that are available for the heat-seeking missile to hit.  Product  Sometimes entrepreneurs (like Aaron) will have such a strong sense of the market that their initial product plan is dead-on.  But most of the time we see the product iterate and morph over time.  As a result, product is often the hardest thing to evaluate pre-launch.   And some of our biggest mistakes have occurred when we passed on companies based on their pre-launch product.  So today we tend to focus on a company's product vision, rather than on the specific implementation of a pre-launch product.  We've also found that a pre-launch product plan is a great way for us to get additional input on the team.  Have they studied the competition?  Do they really understand how to leverage social networks, game mechanics, etc?  Do they have a data-driven philosophy or a gut-driven philosophy.  Why did they make the choices they made?  At the end of the day, I've really come to believe that you can't predict success based on where a missile is pointed pre-launch.  Instead you have to assess the quality of the targeting system (the team) and the density/size of targets (the market).   And hope that the missile you launch finds a true target -- rather than a decoy... 
 Whenever First Round Capital holds a party, we sometimes get emails from a few of our guests asking if they can bring another person with them.  Maybe a VC friend of ours wants to bring another partner with him.  Maybe it’s an entrepreneur who wants to bring a new executive hire.  Maybe it’s someone who works at Facebook and wants to bring a co-worker.  Unless we’re dealing with a venue that has a limited space, we typically are fine with the extra guests.  It’s a great way to expand our network – and meet new, interesting people.  The few times we weren’t able to accommodate those requests typically were due to hard constraints (either budgetary or the size of the venue).  And when we don’t have room, we tell that to the person who asked – and they typically are very understanding.   I just read my friend, Roger Ehrenberg’s, latest blog post on syndicating seed rounds – and totally agree with his main conclusion (that rounds tend to work best if there is a lead investor to represent the interests of the syndicate).  But the most meaningful part of Roger’s post, in my opinion, is when he writes about how a syndicate gets chosen.  Specifically, he writes: ‘One can have a reasoned discussion concerning capacity, etc., but fundamentally if an entrepreneur wants a particular investor in I am going to make room – period.’   I could not agree more.  I think that the entrepreneur should be the “decider” on the syndicate – not the lead investor.  The lead investor should help establish terms, provide feedback and input on potential co-investors, and bring other investors to the table if asked/needed – but the lead investor should not force a syndicate on the entrepreneur.    If I’d react badly to a guest trying to force me to let another guest into my party for a few hours (ie, “the only way I’ll come is if you let this stranger in”), I can only imagine how badly I’d react if I was an entrepreneur that was forced  to spend the next 5+ years with someone I don’t want.  In my view the lead investor should offer feedback and offer introductions – but ultimately should follow the founder’s lead on syndicate composition.  If the founder wants certain angels to participate – done.  If the founder thinks that a certain fund could add value – done.     Just like I think that financing rounds should be based on company math (as opposed to venture math), I think the syndication decision belongs with the founder (as opposed to the investor).  The founder should be free to choose the investors that increase the company’s odds of success.  And building a syndicate is the entrepreneur’s opportunity to figure out who the founder wants to spend time with, who the founder respects, and who the founder thinks can help the company the most.   Oftentimes the first strategic discussion that a lead investor gets to collaborate with a founder on is the discussion around the syndicate.  And while I'd clearly expect a reasoned conversation to occur, I believe that an early stage investor is funding a company because they believe in the entrepreneur's ability to make strategic decisions and to optimize for success.  And ultimately, it should be the investor who follows the founder's lead when it comes to syndicate composition (and not the other way around). 
 I just read the news about Google's upgrades to Google Latitude -- and boy is it a bold move with major implications.  If done right, I think it could ultimately be as transformative as when Facebook opened up the social graph.   Before Facebook opened up their social graph, if a web site wanted to know your relationships/friends it had to ask you.  Each and every time.  Then came Facebook Connect.  What Facebook did with Facebook Connect is to build out (1) a utility/infrastructure that enables third-party sites to gain access to your social graph, and (2) a permissioning model that gives users control of what third-party sites can access your data.  While there are a number of privacy issues that Facebook is working out in public, I believe that they will be ultimately resolved -- and that Facebook's social graph will become integrated throughout the net.    And today, Google announced a similar model for location data.  Previously, whenever an application or website wanted to know where you were it had to ask you for permission to obtain your location from your phone.  Each and every time.  With Google Latitude's new API they are changing the game.  Rather than have dozens of applications that each ask for your location, Google's Latitude application will keep track of your location -- and put it in the cloud.  And then users can authorize third-party applications/sites to access their data.  Three million users already use Google Latitude, making it one of the largest location-based services around.   Assuming Google can work out the privacy implications (which are non-trivial), there could be hundreds of potential applications, like:  Imagine linking your ATM or Credit card with Google Latitude. If you want to make a large ATM withdrawal or charge more than $1,000 -- your bank can check with Google Latitude.  If your phone is more than 500 feet from the transaction point, they might be alerted to fraud. What if you could link your online photos with Google Latitude.  Your photos could be automatically tagged with your location -- just by looking up where your phone was at the time. When you visit a website (like OpenTable or Fandango) on your desktop computer, it can look up your phone's location via Google Latitude and deliver a personalized experience. I could be automatically notified when out-of-town friends come to town -- or my meetings could be notified when I'm running late. Companies can use Google Latitude for expense report creation -- or even to replace time cards. How often does someone go more than 200 feet from their cell phone?  In my experience, not often.  In today's world, your cell phone is now a personal location beacon.  And by making it programatically accessible in the cloud, Google could enable an entirely new class of applications.   Combine this new ability to obtain location from the cloud with the types of tools and data overlays that SimpleGeo (a First Round Capital portfolio company) offers -- and developers now have an amazingly robust set of tools to build upon.    I can't wait to see what they build... 
  I've previously written several blog posts about venture capital fund size -- and how it impacts fund performance.  I just came across a report that Silicon Valley Bank wrote last month which had some amazing data on fund-size and performance.   While I would recommend that you download and read the entire report, I think that the chart below tells a powerful story.  Specifically:   If you were to look at the performance of large funds (those greater than or equal to the vintage year median size) for venture funds between 1983 and 2003, just 2% of the large funds returned more than 2x contributed capital.  And 92% of the funds returned less than 1.5x capital.  But if you were to look at the performance of the small funds (those less than the vintage year median size) for those same years, the performance is much better.  Indeed, 48% of those funds returned 2x -- or, put another way, small funds were 24 times more likely to produce returns above 2x than large funds.  And just 36% of small funds returned less than 1.5x capital.  Wow.  And this is not some small sample -- the SVB study included the returns of more than 850 venture firms...   
 As seed-stage investors, First Round Capital invests early in a company's life.  Typically we're funding PowerPoint slide decks -- and are investing in pre-product, pre-revenue companies with incomplete teams and uncertain business models. The reason we're able to take this much risk is because we only invest in areas we really know:  Internet-enabled businesses (both enterprise and consumers).  By restricting our investments to a specific focus, I find that we are (hopefully) able to leverage our experiences and industry knowledge to help us make smart investment decisions.  My own experiences in eCommerce, for example, have been very helpful to building our investment hypothesis in that area...  One of the best ways for us to stay informed about the industry we invest in is to be hands-on with the technologies that impact the market.  My partners and I were some of the earliest venture bloggers.   We were among the first 140 Twitter users (though I'd gladly trade my early adopter Twitter user-number for Fred Wilson's Twitter equity).  And our recently redesigned First Round Capital website, provides us with a very valuable sandbox from which to explore new web technologies.  The integration of data into the First Round Capital News Feed (including job postings, company news, new investments, tweets, and even foursquare checkins) has helped us better understand the power (and limitations) of the implicit web.  And that's why, when Facebook announced the launch of their distributed "Like Button" today at their f8 conference -- we jumped on it.  Just a few hours ago Facebook launched a feature that allowed publishers to leverage Facebook's social connections inside their own sites.  And they rolled out the feature with over 30 major publishers participating in the launch.  Big publishers such as CNN and ESPN.  And I'm happy to announce that First Round Capital has just joined the list.  The news feed on our homepage now integrates into Facebook - bringing the social graph onto to our site...and hopefully leveraging Facebook to drive incremental traffic.  I think that by being hands-on with new technologies, you can get a good sense of the possibilities they unlock.  And so far, I'm very impressed with the ability to bring social interaction onto our site.  (And I am also impressed with our in-house product manager - who was able to get it live in less than 12 hours after the announcement). 
 What a bizarre world we live in.  My partner, Chris Fralic, has found his trip to London "indefinitely extended" due to a volcano in Iceland.  So he's decided to put together a last minute "Office Hours" tomorrow, Sunday.  I know it's last minute - but it's worth a try.  If you are an entrepreneur in London (or thinking about becoming one), I'd suggest you sign up and stop by:  DATE:  Sunday, April 18th, 2010  TIME:  1300 to 1500 (That's 1PM to 3PM for the rest of us)  LOCATION:  White Bear Yard, 2nd Floor, 144a Clerkenwell Road EC1R 5DF LINK   You can SIGN UP HERE  What can you expect at Office Hours London?  The chance to meet up with someone from First Round Capital to get to know us a bit better, and for us to get to know you and your idea or company.   You'll also have a chance to mingle and interact with folks from other startups, which could be worth the alone -and we'll try to have some tea and coffee and snacks as well.  Have we ever funded a company we've met at Office Hours?  Yes we have, in fact it was just over a year ago at Office Hours New York that we met David Roth, CEO of AppFirst.  We invested along with FirstMark and just yesterday they officially launched at Under The Radar and won the audience and judges award in their category.    Given the short timeframe, I'd appreciate any help in retweeting this or forwarding this to London-based entrepreneurs.  Thanks! 
 I am now experiencing full withdrawal symptoms.  It has now been almost a day and a half without access to my e-mail.  We use Intermedia to host our e-mail -- and have historically found them to be very reliable.  They are the world's largest provider of hosted Exchange.  And their service level agreement "guarantees 100% data protection and less than six minutes of Exchange hosting downtime per year".  Well, they are now 1,680 minutes past their six minutes guarantee...   This outage has shown me just how much I rely on email communication.  But it's also shown me how much I've come to expect open, transparent and constant communication from a vendor.  I totally get that despite every precaution, an outage can occur.  I get the fact that despite Intermedia's massive investment in DataEcho™ technology that securely replicates Exchange data across two of their four datacenters, the system can crash.  It might be human error.  It might be a hardware failure.  Shit happens.   What I don't get is why Intermedia has been so poor in their communication.  The "Network Status" page on their website reads as if it is targeted towards IT folks rather than people.  While it tries to explain mail queing, it never says "Hey...we're sorry.  We know we took down your email and that's not acceptable."  There has been not one post on their blog during this outage -- and the last post is still a whitepaper highlighting the benefiuts of outsourced Exchange hosting.  The last update on their twitter account is 19 hours old and inaccurate, stating that "At this time all services are online and functional..."  The Intermedia phone lines are unreachable.  And the homepage of their website has not changed at all -- with the "What's New" section not updated since March 4th.      You want me to tell you what's new???  Your service has been out for more than 24 hours.  I was almost unable to file my taxes yesterday (and god help any accountants that used Intermedia) and my partner is stuck in London because of a volcano.  We're not getting email and you aren't talking to me!   For a company that is in the business of helping people manage their digital communications, Intermedia's failure to communicate is an inexcusable failure.  It has reinforced to me the importance of open and transparent communications.  I'm not saying they need to add a live stream to their homepage like First Round Capital has.  Just that they should use the tools they already have (their homepage, their blog, their twitter account and their network status pages) to talk with their customers.      Now, given the fact that you historically have been so reliable and operated with virtually no downtime, I would assume that you've built your customer communications plans on the assumption that outages will be short and temporary.  I agree that if you are down/slow for 4 minutes, you don't need to re-write your homepage and put out a press release.  But I do think you need to have a completely different communication plan when faced with a massive failure.   When US Airways flight 1549 crashed in the Hudson River last year, I was very impressed with US Airways' response.  The homepage of their site had information updated hourly.  They released 8 press releases in the first 48 hours after the crash.  Their CEO was visible and making statements to the press -- even with incomplete information.  Now I know there is a huge difference between a server crash and a plane crash.  But I do think that there is something Intermedia can learn from US Airways.   Communication, even with uncertainty, is better than silence. Use all of the social tools out there to communicate with your customers.  If people are complaining on Twitter, respond to them.  It's amazing to see people like myself, Stewart Alsop, and others tweeting to Intermedia without a response.  Speak to them as people -- not as engineers.  US Airways didn't start talking about engine construction and plane salvage.  Their CEO spoke with candor and personality.  Say you're sorry.  And acknowledge the inconvenience.  Don't talk to me about mail queuing and RFC mail servers. Be reachable.  US Airways set up websites and special phone number to reach them.    The negative effects of silence are worse than the negative effects of communication.  For example, I assume that there must be some PR people at Intermedia that are worried that if they communicate about their outage too much (on their homepage, twitter, blog) than people won't want to use Intermedia.  I think that this is actually the opposite.  I am more upset by Intermedia's silence than by their outage.  I've flown over 100,000 miles on US Airways since flight 1549 crashed -- in part because of the confidence I had after seeing the way they handled that crash (and also in part that it's hard to live in Philadelphia and fly any other airline).  But I do have a lot of choices for email providers.  And I'm not sure how much longer First Round Capital will be relying on Intermedia after seeing how they handled their crash.   [And to save everyone the time in their comments -- yes, we will be considering Google's mail product] 
 It happens almost every day.  I'm talking with an entrepreneur about their business idea (say, for example, a new enterprise security software product).  And at some point in the meeting, they tell me about the conversations with people they had in their target market (say, for example, 13 CIOs) who all thought it was a great idea and want to beta test the software.  After seeing many of these companies fail to get traction in the market, I've come to realize that the key challenge is not "convincing" your customer -- it's reaching your customer.  Customers are inundated with options and choice -- and the hardest part of the "selling" process is not getting the sale.  It's getting the meeting.  And while marketers have learned that it's all about the "message," I think it's all about the "attention".  How do you get your customer's attention?  At my first company, Infonautics, we had built two online reference products called Homework Helper and Electric Library.   The main offering was an online service that offered access to over 2,000 full-text magazines, newspapers, books and other resources targeted at junior and senior high school students.  While it might not sound revolutionary now, keep in mind that Electric Library launched in 1995 -- this was back in the 1200 baud modem days...around the same time as Netscape shipped their first web browser.  And we had to get almost all the content scanned/digitized because it was not available in an electronic format.  This was such a big deal that Al Gore gave us a quote for our launch press release.   While the service was targeted at students, we realized that the parents made the buying decision.  Everyone loved the idea.  Parents loved it.  Walt Mossberg loved it.  I could spend five minutes talking to a parent -- and I'd get 9 out of 10 to buy an annual subscription for $69.95.  But when we tried to market the product, we failed to get any meaningful traction.  We tried online advertising.  We tried direct mail.  We tried print advertising in magazines and newspapers.  We tried email advertising.  We tried marketing through groups and organizations (PTA's, American Federation of Teachers, etc).  We even tried an infomercial.  Seriously.  An infomercial!!  (I recently uploaded the 2 minute and 30 minute infomercials -- hard to believe that was less than 15 years ago).  After four years of trying to market a consumer-service, Infonautics ultimately pivoted and sold site licenses to school libraries.  So, here's my advice:  While it's important to have a product that people want -- that's not enough.  In this age of information overload -- you need to find a scalable, cost-effective way to get your customer's attention.  You need to find a way to get them to lower their guard and engage in the conversation.  Otherwise, you will be filming infomercials that no one watches... 
 I had the chance to speak on a panel about Online Shopping at a NextNY event this week. And after a great discussion, I started talking with some folks about my last blog post (which commented on how little has changed in online shopping since I founded Half.com back in 1999 -- especially given the vast amount of change that has occurred on the web outside of shopping).    And I wanted to put a little more specifics/numbers to my thinking.  So I did a little digging on Alexa today -- and found some data that appears to confirm my perspective:  More than half of today's top 15 most trafficked websites today did not exist back in 1999.  That is not a surprise, as Facebook, Youtube, Wikipedia, Myspace, Blogger, Live.com and Twitter are all new -- and are representative of the massive amount of innovation and disruption that has occurred in the last decade. Yet, of the top 15 most trafficked eCommerce websites today, just one of them did not exist back in 1999 (NewEgg - which launched in 2001).  Which means that over 90% of the top eCommerce websites are over 12 years old!  That is pretty remarkable to me -- and reflects an amazing lack of external innovation (and disruption).      And if you compare today's top 15 list of eCommerce websites to this list from 2005, you'll see it's almost identical.  So not only have almost all the top eCommerce sites existed for 12 years -- there has been virtually no dislocation among the leaders. As I said in my last post, I believe we've seen more innovation (and potential for disruption) in eCommerce in the last 10 months than we have in the last 10 years -- with group buying, demand aggregation, game mechanics, flash/group sales, leveraging the social graph for customer acquisition and mobile.  And, I believe that this is a great time to be investing in these disruptive models.  Anyone want to bet whether, in the five years from now, the top 15 eCommerce sites will look pretty different than they look today? 
 It’s hard to believe it’s been 10 years since we launched Half.com.  (Unless you watch the video of Half.com's launch on the Today Show -- in which case you'll see how much I've aged since then)  One of the things that’s surprised me the most over the last decade is how little transformative innovation has occurred in ecommerce.  eBay looks pretty much the same as it did a decade ago.  Amazon looks pretty much the same as it did a decade ago.  While the top 10 sites on the Internet have changed dramatically over the last decade, the top 10 online shopping sites on the Internet have not.  The traditional catalog/cart shopping model remains pretty much unchanged.  I’m not sure of the reasons why so little innovation has occurred – perhaps it is because of Google.  Specifically, the fact that online retailers had a scalable, measurable, and predictable source of customer traffic (through both SEO and Adwords) might have reduced the external pressures to innovate.  However, the online shopping paradigm is finally changing.  Indeed, I think we’ve seen more innovation in the last 10 months than in the last 10 years.  We’ve seen an explosion of interesting technologies and opportunities that seek to change online shopping, such as:  Mobile SNO (Social Network Optimization) User Generated Content  Private Sale Shopping Sites Virtual Goods  Behavioral Data Augmentation Game Dynamics Demand Aggregation Real Time Marketing and Messaging API's that allow for syndicated shopping Alternative Payment Technologies At First Round Capital we haven’t been bashful about investing in these spaces.  In fact, we currently have over a dozen companies in our portfolio that seek to transform online shopping.  And tonight we put those companies on display at our first ever First Round Capital eCommerce Summit.   Like our previous one-day events for our advertising-focused and entertainment-focused companies, the goal of this summit was to give our portfolio companies a forum to make brief (6 minute) presentations to their target customers.  So we were really excited that we were able to attract over 100 attendees from the country’s leading eCommerce sites, brands, tool providers, analysts and influencers – including representatives from Alibris, Apple, CafePress, eBags, eBay, Fandango, Forrester, Gap.com, Google, GSI, Ice.com, Intuit, Magento, Omniture, Open Table, P&G, ProFlowers, QVC, Red Envelope, Safeway.com, Shopping.com, Shopzilla, Shutterfly, StubHub, Urban Outfitters, Williams Sonoma, Ylighting and Zappos.  I left the day really proud of our portfolio – and excited about the future of eCommerce! 
 A lot has happened since we started First Round Capital in 2004.  We've invested in over 75 amazing companies, grown our team to include 8 investment professionals, and opened offices in three states.  We've also become the most active seed-stage firm in the country -- with the most visited VC website.   Yet, despite all this change, our website remained pretty much the same as it looked in 2004.   Well, not anymore.  Today I'm excited to announce the launch of the new firstround.com website.  The core of the site is the First Round Capital News Feed (bring it on Facebook) on our homepage - which incorporates our new investment announcements, our blog posts, portfolio company news and job postings, and selective tweets and Four Square checkins from the First Round Capital team. And while we really haven't changed our firm's focus over the last six years, we still thought it was important for us to highlight why we think we’re unique - and what we look for.  Our portfolio page allows you to sort our portfolio companies by location and tag cloud.  And every portfolio company’s page now integrates their tweets, blog posts and job listings – as well as links to any of their applications (like iPhone, browser plugins, etc) that can be downloaded. Since all our investment professionals blog, we've integrated everyone's work-related blog posts onto one page - and made it easy to subscribe to all the posts from one RSS feed.  One of the most helpful things a VC can do for a portfolio company is to help them find key hires.  And the jobs section of our site contains well over 125 current job openings within our portfolio.  Indeed, just last month our website was responsible for connecting over 1,000 candidates to our portfolio companies.  In addition to posting the listings on our site, you can find them via an RSS feed of the jobs or at our @frcjobs Twitter account.  And be sure to signup for our Key Hire Wire newsletter which emails you one 1-3 executive jobs in our portfolio each week. Finally, since it's pretty rare that a day goes buy without some news from a First Round Capital portfolio company, you can keep up with the news on our news page -- or subscribe to our news RSS Feed or follow our @FirstRound account on Twitter.  Our firm today looks very different than it did six years ago -- and now our website does too.  I'd love to hear your thoughts and suggestions.   
 One of the most useful things a VC can ever do for a portfolio company is to help a CEO make a key hire. While every hire is important, some additions are pivotal value creating moments in the life of a company.    In an effort to find new ways to be helpful to the companies that we invest in, First Round Capital is starting a weekly e-mail newsletter that will highlight some of the best opportunities to work with the great teams we've backed.  Each week, we are going to send out a single e-mail with just 2 or 3 senior-level jobs (Director-level and above) that we want to find the best people for.  We just sent out our first email went out this week, which featured three amazing opportunities:  Vice President, Marketing - DoubleVerify (NYC)  Regional Vice President of Sales - BazaarVoice (Austin)  Senior Director, Product Management, BigDeal.com - San Francisco, CA   Would you like to get these weekly emails? If so, sign up here...  (And if you're interested in seeing all 166 current job openings at First Round Capital portfolio companies, be sure to check out http://jobs.firstround.com/ or just follow FRCJobs on Twitter). 
 Yesterday was one of my favorite days of the year.   Not because Steve Jobs unveiled an iPod with a 9 inch screen.  Not because it was Obama’s First State of the Union Address.  Not because of any earth-shaking pronouncement made at Davos.  But rather, because it was the First Round Capital CEO Summit.  It was the one day each year where all of the CEOs/Founders of our portfolio companies come together in one place.   It was an amazing experience for me – to see so many smart people in one room.  Exchanging ideas and sharing experiences.  Doing deals with each other.  Asking each other for help.     I know that in addition to being cash constrained, the typical entrepreneur is even more time constrained.  And asking our entrepreneurs to spend a whole day of their time away from their office is asking them to make a big time investment.   And judging from the responses we’ve seen so far, I think the day was a success all around.      One of the benefits of having a fairly large portfolio is that our portfolio companies can offer a lot of value to each other.  Whether it is sharing interview techniques, technical management strategies, sales leads, perspectives on the advertising market, or doing deals - it is always great to see portfolio companies helping each other succeed.  And now, I'm excited to announce that First Round Capital entrepreneurs also have the potential to benefit economically from  each others success.  That is because yesterday we unveiled the First Round Capital Entrepreneur's Exchange fund.  This exchange fund was created to allow First Round Capital entrepreneurs to contribute a small piece of the stock they own in their company  -- and share in the upside of all the other companies.  The fund is only available to qualified First Round Capital portfolio companies and First Round Capital does not receive any economic upside from the fund.  The goal of the fund is to allow our entrepreneurs to get the benefit of some tax efficient diversification without giving up their upside prematurely.      When I was an entrepreneur, I remember the feeling of having all my eggs in one basket -- and it is our hope that this fund will remove some of that stress.  Now our entrepreneurs can get the same diversified portfolio that our limited partners get (with better economic terms) and receive a financial benefit when other First Round Companies exit (even if their own company is still years away from an exit).  I'm super excited about this fund -- as (I think) it is the first time that a VC firm created an exchange fund just for their entrepreneurs.  In addition to allowing our entrepreneurs to exchange their shares into the fund, I believe this fund will result in more sharing and exchanging of ideas and assistance between the companies.   I really want to thank the entire First Round Capital team along with our outside speakers and resources for putting on a great CEO Summit: Dick Costolo, Eric Ries, Jeff Jordan, Mike Marquez, Peter Kafka, Ethan Beard, Ted Wang, Satish Dharmaraj, Andrew Chen, Chris Mahl, and Andy Getsey.  
 Susan Boyle was a dreamer.  She believed in her talent -- and just needed a platform to help the world hear it.  This past year we saw what can happen when the right talent is combined with the right platform.  Susan became a viral hit -- with over 80 million views on her YouTube video.  And this past week her debut album smashed all records --racking up the biggest one-week sales total of the year, and the highest debut ever for a solo female artist.  Well, Susan's not the only one with talent.  We are fortunate to work with a pretty amazing group of entrepreneurs.  A talented group of people -- who dream big dreams.  And we're happy to present First Round Capital's annual holiday video to demonstrate it.     
 It happens all the time.  I’m meeting with an entrepreneur, who is telling me about a really innovative product idea for a consumer website.  And I’m liking it.  We’re going back and forth on product ideas.  And before I know it, we’re approaching the end of our meeting.  I then ask them, “So, how are you going to acquire customers.”  And that’s when it happens.  That’s when I realize that they’ve spent all their time focusing on the product/site, and aren’t nearly as innovative when it comes to their customer acquisition plans.  They view marketing as something they can “bolt on” afterwards.  The most disappointing answer is when they say “Oh, we’ll just make it viral.”  As if virality is something you can choose to add in after the product is baked - like a spell checker.  Let’s imagine the conversation at the marketing department of the wireless phone companies.  “Let’s see.  Should we spend $4 Billion on advertising this year…or should we just make it viral?”.  Virality is something that has to be engineered from the beginning…and it’s harder to create virality than it is to create a good product.  That's why we often see good products with poor virality, and poor products with good virality.  The reason that over $150 Billion is spent on US advertising each year is because virality is so hard.  If virality was easy, there would be no advertising industry.  That’s why First Round Capital’s website has always said: “Too many companies treat marketing and sales as a tactical afterthought. We believe marketing is strategic and seek companies that are marketing focused – with marketing requirements driving product development.”  Customer acquisition (also called distribution) is the number one challenge facing consumer web properties.  And that's why I'll be digging in deep on this subject through a series of blog posts where I hope to focus in depth on the challenges (and opportunities) in customer acquisition…  Up next:  "Business Development and Distribution" 
 I just came across a great report by Industry Little Hawk entitled the Venture Capital Rebound (pdf).  In the report, the authors reach a similar conclusion to Paul Kedrosky (read Paul's great research for the Kauffman Foundation here) -- that too much capital has gone into venture capital.  Paul has argued that we need to shrink the amount of venture funding by 50% -- a statistic that almost every VC agrees with.  (Ironically, 100% of VCs would argue that their fund should be in the half that survives).  What is refreshing about the Industry Little Hawk white paper, however, is that they don't just advocate reducing the capital allocated to venture.  Instead, they advocate allocating capital to smaller funds.  And they articulate a number of reasons for their position (smaller funds are better positioned for the current exit landscape, better alignment with entrepreneurs (per my last post) and with limited partners, etc).  The "money stat" from the paper is that in the 1980's there were just 12 venture funds above $250M.  Today there are over 408 - and 30 over $1B.  And most of this fund-size growth took place in the last 10 years.  The chart is below:    What is interesting to me is that the proposed solution isn't a radical change.  It isn't a novel idea for re-structuring the industry.  Rather, it's a realization that venture should go back to it's roots.  So I spent some time researching the origins of many leading venture firms.  And I was surprised to see that they all started with small funds.  While venture is far from perfect, and can always improve, maybe we should spend less of our time working on "new solutions" to the "venture is broken problem" and spend more time working on old ones.  The data speaks for itself.  My favorite factoid: the initial funds of Accel, Kleiner Perkins, CRV, Mayfield, Venrock, Greylock, NEA, TA & Sequoia COMBINED were under $125M!  And even on an inflation-adjusted basis the average fund size is $55M.        Note: I pulled data from the web and from Udayan Gupta's book Done Deals -- if you think I have incorrect data, or you have missing data, just leave it in the comments and I'll update the post.     
 Fred Wilson has a great blog post today entitled The 'We Need to Own' Baloney.  In it he discussed the fact that many VC's apply arbitrary ownership thresholds to investments.  I couldn't agree with Fred more - but I'd take it even further.  This is not just limited to ownership requirements.  Rather, VC's often impose "VC math" on companies in three areas:  The amount VC's "need" to own The amount VC's "need" to invest The return VC's "need" to generate certain exit returns These "requirements" are a direct result of the mathematical model that venture funds are optimized for.  And as fund's have gotten larger, their math has gotten more difficult.  We're now witnessing the conclusion of a "10 year experiment" where money invested in venture funds has exploded and fund sizes have more than tripled in size.  A decade ago, 75% of all venture funds raised were under $100 million.  In 2007, fewer than 25% of all venture funds raised were under $100M.  And I don't think it's a co-incidence that VC performance has fallen off a cliff during this time period.  Indeed, we're approaching a point where the 10-year return in venture capital is negative.  Paul Kedrosky recently authored a paper for the Kauffman Foundation which discusses this in great detail and proposes that the venture industry needs to be "rightsized" -- and suggests a 50% reduction.  It's a great paper -- but if you don't have time to read it, the money chart is below:       Fred Wilson has previously written about the VC math problem -- but he approached it from the macro/industry perspective.  I agree, and think it's even more scary when you look at it from a micro/fund perspective.  Take a $400M venture fund.  In order to get a 20% return in 6 years, they need to triple the fund -- or return $1.2B.  Add in fees/carry and you now have to return $1.5B.  Assuming that the fund owns 20% of their portfolio companies on exit, they need to create $7.5B of market value.  So assume that one VC invested in Skype, Myspace and Youtube in the same fund - they would be just halfway to their goal.  Seriously?  A decade ago, any one of those deals would have been (and should have been) a fundmaker!   As a result of this new math, VC's end up super-focused on the longbets (or moonshots) and frequently remove optionality for mid-tier exits.  It has, as Super LP Chris Douvos has written, become a game of finding the next Curtis Sharp.  It is because of the challenges of "VC math" that First Round Capital chose to raise a relatively small fund -- allowing us to continue to make initial investments that average $600K.   I understand the importance of aligning one's time and capital to the upside opportunity, and recognize that there is some minimum threshold of ownership that is required for a VC to commit the time and attention to an opportunity.  Does it make sense for an investor to spend the time and join the board of a company they own 2% of ?  Probably not.  However, the difference between 25% and 20% ownership -- or even the difference between 20% and 10% -- should not prevent a VC from investing in a promising opportunity.   It is the same "VC math" which drives a VC to seek to deploy a larger amount of capital into a company.  (Often taking a capital efficient company and helping it become capital inefficient).  And it is the same math which sometimes creates a lack of alignment between a founder and a VC around exit opportunities.  I have previously written these issues when I discussed the "unwritten terms on a term sheet".   A company's outcome should drive VC returns.  When VC's required returns drive company's outcomes, it's a recipe for trouble.   
 I believe that as the world has gotten “flatter” over the last decade, it’s created a big opportunity for venture investors who recognized that great entrepreneurs can come up with great ideas in almost any location.  Indeed, over the last several years, First Round Capital has invested nationally and has funded companies in over a dozen states.  However, I do believe that certain ecosystems provide real leverage when it comes to the hard work of turning those ideas into reality.  Take acting for example.  Despite the fact that Philadelphia has some great theaters (like the Kimmel Center, the Walnut Street Theatre, the Arden Theatre, the Prince Theater, the Forrest Theatre, etc), I’m pretty sure that almost every young Philly-based actor recognizes the unique opportunities to really hone their craft on Broadway or in Hollywood -- and those who have big career aspirations typically move to NYC or LA.  The right ecosystem can take good raw materials and set it lose on a new trajectory.  That’s why Stumbleupon moved from Calgary to San Francisco, why Jimmy Wales moved from Florida to San Francisco to start Wikia, and why Jingle Networks moved from Michigan to Boston.  And that’s why, four years ago, First Round Capital set up our west coast office (led by Rob Hayes) to firmly plant ourselves in the silicon valley ecosystem.  Today more than half of our portfolio is based in California.   Over the last several years, we’ve found that the New York City ecosystem has been particularly strong for Internet and media-based startups.  In fact, we’ve met hundreds of really talented New York-based entrepreneurs and funded over 10 NYC-based startups in the last few years – including Appnexus, Knewton, On Deck Capital, Pinch Media, DoubleVerify and others.  And while First Round Capital already spends a lot of time in New York, I’m super excited to announce our plans to increase our presence in the big apple by opening a First Round Capital office in New York City (led by my partner Howard Morgan) -- and the addition of Charlie O’Donnell to our team as an Entrepreneur-in-Residence (EIR).  The obvious strength of the NYC community was on display in the incredible conversations I had at our Office Hours event at Live Bait and in those between entrepreneurs at Meet-Ups around the city, at ShakeShack, at the quality of entrepreneurs involved in First Growth, and in the NextNY community to name a few.  As we looked for ways to support this community, to listen to and learn from entrepreneurs and to help them build great companies in the city, I could not think of a better way to begin than by working with Charlie as our first Entrepreneur in Residence. Charlie’s belief that great companies are lead by great CEOs but also are born from great communities matches my experience as both an entrepreneur and an investor. His work as an organizer, supporter, and participant in the NY tech scene over the past several years has been amazing and I could not be happier to have him join the First Round team.  As seed stage investors we have the privilege of working with entrepreneurs as they establish the DNA of their business and we hope you will work with us as we put down deeper roots in the city. 
 I’m super excited by today’s news that Intuit has acquired Mint.com for $170 million.     It’s been amazing to watch Aaron Patzer and the entire Mint team transform a rough prototype to a world-class product over the last three years.  As my partner, Rob Hayes (who led our investment in Mint and served on their board of director’s) wrote this morning:     "It has been a short 3 years since we met Aaron Patzer at a STIRR dinner in the Valley.  Seven days after we met, he had a term sheet for his seed round and off he went.  During that time we have had a ringside seat while the company grew from a rough prototype on Aaron’s computer to an amazing personal finance tool with well over 1 million users and critical acclaim... " (Continued here)     I look forward to watching the Mint team continue to thrive at Intuit -- this deal was mint to be.  And while I know Aaron always preaches fiscal discipline, he's now a member of the First Round Capital "blank check club" -- and should he ever start another company, he can come to us to claim it ;-)     Congratulations to Aaron and the entire Mint.com team! 
 While venture capitalists pass on companies for many reasons, one of the most common reasons is that they don't think the opportunity is "big enough".   What does this mean?  It means that even if the company executes as planned, the VC doesn't think the exit will be large enough to generate the VC-sized returns.  This determination is based on the venture capitalist's "fund math" and their expected returns model.  It means that VC doesn't think he will make a big enough return by investing here.  What doesn't this mean?  This doesn't mean that the business is not going to succeed.  It doesn't mean that the entrepreneur will fail.  It just means that the VC doesn't think that the return profile of an investment in the business is a fit for a venture capital investment.  Like all VC's, I pass on many companies that I think will be successful and teams that I really like.  I do so because I think that the economic returns won't move my needle.  (And as one smallest venture funds around, my needle is smaller than most other funds.  And yes, I say this because I am self confident enough to handle the "small needle" jokes).   However when I do pass for this reason, I try to make sure that I communicate the reason for my decision.  Specifically, I state that while I think the entrepreneur will make money here -- I just don't think I will generate the risk-adjusted returns I need.   I think the industry places too much of a premium on raising venture capital -- and it has become the default operating assumption for every entrepreneur.  Entrepreneurs can create great businesses -- and have great outcomes -- without raising meaningful outside capital.  Just ask James Hong at HotOrNot, Eric Marcoullier at MyBlogLog, and David Clouse of VRBO.  Part of the problem, I think, is that the technology startup ecosystem seems to be structured so that the goal of every entrepreneur is to raise venture financing.  There is a pretty strong gravitational force that pulls entrepreneurs towards raising VC dollars -- and it's often hard for an entrepreneur to overcome the inertia.  However, I also think that a big part of the problem is that there is no good word/phrase to describe these type of companies.  The only phrase I've heard used is "lifestyle business" -- but I think that is inaccurate and pretty demeaning.  It falsely implies that these entrepreneurs aren't working as hard as those of VC-backed companies.  It falsely implies that these entrepreneurs are choosing a better lifestyle than they would have if they were operating a VC-backed company.  And, as 37signals has written, it condescendingly implies that "A lifestyle business is for the hacks and amateurs while a real business is for the big guns and grown-ups."  I think we need a new word.  Something that isn't demeaning.  Something that doesn't imply laziness or lack of effort.   And maybe the best way to generate that word is by crowdsourcing it.  Fred Wilson posted a similar challenge in 2006 and it sparked the word "freemium".  And Brad Feld just posted a naming challenge yesterday.   So here's my challenge -- help me find a new name for "lifestyle business".  Post your suggestions in the comments.  I've also created a public challenge for this on ChallengePost.  Thanks!   
 I had a blast at our Philadelphia Office Hours.  My partners and I met with over 50 entrepreneurs at our biggest Office Hours yet.  My favorite was being pitched by an entrepreneur who arrived directly from Penn's graduation, still in his cap and gown.  Well, we are hitting the road with Office Hours again.  This time in San Francisco.  Please join us for Office Hours in San Francisco on June 11th from Noon - 2PM PST.  This event will mark two firsts for us.  For the first time, the entire First Round Capital team will participate.  And it will also be the first time that we hold Office Hours in, well, our office.  As with all of our Office Hours events, this is your opportunity to meet with the First Round Capital team and start a conversation about your start-up, your ideas, or yourself.  While the meetings are brief, we've found they are a good way to start a dialog and build a relationship.  We hope to see you at our office... 
 Over the last several months, First Round Capital has held our "Office Hours" events in San Francisco, New York City, Austin and Vancouver.  Well, now it's time to bring it home!  I'm super excited to announce our first Office Hours event here in Philadelphia.  Please join us on Monday, May 18th from 3-5pm at World Cafe Live.  One of the greatest opportunities in college was Office Hours. Every professor held them and suddenly became accessible. It was a few minutes where you could walk-in, sit down, ask questions, develop a relationship and catch a professor in an informal environment. We think the same opportunity for dialogue should exist for entrepreneurs and venture capitalists.  At Office Hours, we'd love to meet with entrepreneurs, people thinking about becoming entrepreneurs or folks who would like to join a start-up.  No agenda needed.  No presentations or preparation required.  Just an opportunity to discuss entrepreneurship and startups.  We've met with 50-60 entrepreneurs at every other city -- let's make Philadelphia our biggest event yet! 
 Last week the Wall Street Journal ran a story highlighting several entrepreneurs who are forgoing salary in order to keep their business alive.  I’ve often believed that the true measure of an entrepreneur’s character comes not during the boom times, but how they react in times of adversity and challenge.  Personally, I think I grew more as an entrepreneur during the years when Infonautics struggled (and the stock price languished) than I did during the Half.com rocketship.  You learn a lot about yourself and the people around you when you’re in the foxhole and things aren’t looking good.   That’s why I’m so proud to have worked with Doug Camplejohn, Ofer Doitel, Roger Matus and Sean True.  These entrepreneurs founded two First Round Capital companies - Mi5 Networks and Inboxer.  These entrepreneurs experienced -- and overcame -- real adversity during their startup journey.  These entrepreneurs went without salary at times, even investing personal capital to help their company meet payroll.  These entrepreneurs all passionately believed in what they were building.   And last month their belief paid off, as these entrepreneurs succesfully led their companies to acquisitions.  Doug and Ofer led Mi5 Networks to a sale to Symantec – a wonderful outcome for their team, their investors and their customers.   And Roger and Sean led Inboxer to a sale to Safecore – allowing Inboxer’s employees, investors and customers to benefit from a much stronger platform.  I’m honored to have worked with all four of  these men .  They are true entrepreneurs.  And I can only hope to have the opportunity to get back into the foxhole with them in their future ventures.  
 I just read Fred Wilson's post about communicating bad news to investors.  I completely agree that it is important for CEO's to avoid surprising their board and to communicate bad news just as fast as you share the good news.  However, one of the big changes I've seen in the last several years has been the incrased use of SaaS tools to manage reporting -- and how that subtlely changes the dynamic of board meetings.  For example, through Google Analytics, I have access to real-time dashboards of almost all my portfolio companies.  So, when I walk into a Modcloth board meeting, I already have seen their traffic and revenue for the month.  Several of my portfolio companies that focus on direct sales have created accounts on Salesforce.com for board members with a customized Board dashboard to provide a 30,000 foot view of the pipeline.  The power of the Implict Web is that data that previously had been in hard-to-access silos is now easily accessible and shareable.  This can change the way information is used and shared within organizations.  I've written about this before, and said:   By providing [a board with] open access to information sources there are a number of benefits:  It eliminates surprises. By providing a continual stream of information, the board should never be surprised.  It makes board meetings much more productive.  Rather than spend a lot of time presenting the raw data, the CEO can now provide interpretation and analysis of data -- they can put the numbers in context.  It allows board members to make more meaningful suggestions.  Different board members have different skills. Some are strong at enterprise sales -- and by tracking a sales pipeline over time they might be able to identify areas for improvement in the sales cycle.  I personally am stronger at online consumer marketing -- and feel that by having access to website traffic reporting I can ask better questions and make better recommendations.  Sharing data with a board does not mean that you are sharing control. Rather, I believe that an informed and knowledgeable board will be less intrusive (and more hands-off) than a board that is in the dark. (That said, a CEO should clearly set expectations that they are not looking to get the "why are Tuesday's sales 2% lower than Monday's sales" phone call. )   Too many CEO's try to hide their bad news and setbacks -- they stick it in the fifth paragraph of a six paragraph email.  I get extremely uncomfortable with that approach. It forces the investor into the role of detective -- constantly on the look out for hidden clues. 
 My first company was called Infonautics.  I co-founded it in 1991 when I was an undergraduate at Penn.  This was back in the dark ages of online services -- when people used 1200 or 2400 baud modems.  Our initial product (called Homework Helper) was one of the first consumer "search engines" -- we created an online library of over 2,000 magazines, books and newspapers focused on kids -- and made it available online (via services like Prodigy).  We spent four years negotiating the rights to high quality content. Not surprisingly, publishers didn't even have digital versions.  We ended up sending a lot of stuff overseas to be scanned/keyed in.  And then the web browser was invented and consumers started going online in droves.  While we decided to leverage the Internet for distribution, we did not include web content in our index.   The first time I saw WebCrawler, in 1994, I remember thinking, "Wow - indexing the web instead of licensing data directly...neat idea!  Too bad we didn't think of that.  We really missed that boat."  Then, we saw Yahoo.  And while we contemplated adding "web content" to our proprietary database, we concluded that it was too late -- and that the search game was "won" by Yahoo and WebCrawler.  And we would differentiate ourselves based on the quality of our proprietary content.  Then came Excite, Infoseek and Lycos  -- now it was really too late for us to move towards web search.  These guys were well funded and had all the momentum.  For sure they were going to own the space.  Then came Altavista and Magellan.  I thought Altavista had search nailed.  Game over for sure.  Then came Dogpile, Inktomi, HotBot.   Then Ask Jeeves launched with the ability to actually give you an answer to your question.  Then Goto.com (later Overture) launched with a really novel business model.  Then, finally, in 1998 (seven years after Infonautics was founded), came Google.  Boy, they must have been nuts to go up against such a strong array of well-funded competitors?  The two lessons I learned from this experience can be best summarized by Yogi Berra quotes:  If you come to a fork in the road, take it. Infonautics was in the right place in the right time -- but made some wrong decisions.  (Or, as Yogi said "We made too many wrong mistakes").  We were so locked into our initial strategy and vision that we were unwilling to "pivot" in response to changes in the market.  We had all of the necessary ingredients (funding, search technology, data center, hardware, engineering team, and consumer interface) but were unwilling to change the recipe.  Some of the most successful companies have been "pivots".  PayPal started out as a service to beam money through Palm Pilots, while YouTube was originally a video dating site. The truth is that early stage ventures are all about experimentation and iteration. As soon as it's written, every business plan is wrong. Good entrepreneurs recognize this, and tend to build agile teams that can quickly respond to early market information in order to identify a real business model and minimize risk.  It ain't over till it's over.   Boy, do I wish Yogi could have been on the Board of Directors of Infonautics.  We made a huge mistake by calling "game over" too early - we had already conceded the game during the first inning.  (In fact, some could say that we called "game over" while they were still singing the National Anthem).  When you are in the middle of the game, you don't have the benefit of being able to look at the scoreboard to tell you what inning it is in - but I've learned that successful entrepreneurs typically resist the natural tendency to assume it's later than it really is.  And while Infonautics was successful enough to go public in April of 1996, the company struggled until it's ultimate demise.   An interesting thought:  Is the "search game" over today?  Or are we simply in the seventh inning of the ballgame watching what appears to be a blowout by Google?  Ten years from now, will someone be blogging about how silly we were to surrender the search game to Google by saying "game over" in search?   Perhaps, in the words of Yogi Berra, "Nobody goes there anymore. It's too crowded." 
 I've been thinking a lot about the market/economy lately, and what the economic downturn means for startups.  And I've come to the conclusion that while the economic crisis does present serious challenges to startups, it it might also offer a real opportunity to attack large entrenched players.   Back in 2000, after I sold Half.com to eBay, I remained with eBay for a few years.  And while I was there I was a witness to their battle with (and ultimate defeat by/acquisition of) PayPal.  There are many reasons why PayPal won -- but I think it really came down to the differences in "risk tolerance" between a startup and a large public company.  Let me give two examples:  1.  PayPal had a different risk tolerance level for legal risk. Around the time that PayPal launched, eBay launched its own payment product called Billpoint.  Paypal's product was widely seen as the better product -- it was easier to use, had less "friction" for sellers, and was well designed.  Billpoint was clunky and forced the seller (and buyer) to go through several additional steps.  The conventional wisdom was that PayPal had a better product team and that eBay was clueless.  From what I saw inside eBay, that wasn't really the story.  I believe that eBay understood everything that was needed to build a great payments product.  They were just unable to do so given the risks involved.  Specifically, I believe that PayPal had a better product than Billpoint because they were willing/able to take risks that Billpoint/eBay was not.  For example, when PayPal first launched, it was pretty clear that their product violated the operating rules for Visa, Mastercard and American Express -- and violated banking regulations is more than 40 different states.   PayPal's bet was that they could ultimate resolve these issues after their product had won in the marketplace.  (And that if they didn't win in the marketplace, the legal risks didn't matter).  And they were right.   In late 2000, MasterCard threatened to terminate PayPal's ability to accept MasterCard cards for payment -- and PayPal ultimately worked the issue out.   In 2001, Visa said that PayPal was violating their operating rules -- and PayPal ultimately worked the issue out.  Over a dozen states investigated PayPal and several including Louisiana and New York concluded that PayPal was offering "illegal banking".  Ultimately, PayPal was able to work the issues out (and ended up applying for money services business licenses in more than 25 states).  It was clear to me (from inside eBay), that the Billpoint team knew exactly what they needed to do in order to offer a comparable product to PayPal.  They just were unwilling to accept the risks of doing so.  As a large public company, eBay could not afford to violate the laws of 40 states.  As a small private company, PayPal was willing to take the risk.   2.  PayPal had a different risk tolerance level for financial risk. PayPal was one of the earliest success stories for online viral marketing.  Every time a user sent money to someone, the recipient had to become a PayPal user in order to access their money.  And to add fuel to the fire, PayPal launched a "refer-a-friend" bounty program, where they gave users $5 everytime they invited a new user -- and gave the new user $5 when they deposited money into their account.  PayPal was willing to invest millions of dollars to acquire new customers.  According to their financial filings with the SEC, PayPal spent over $15M in marketing fees in 2000 and lost over $169 Million that year.   eBay, on the other hand,  was profitable in 2000 -- with Net Income of $48M.  Given the pressures that Wall Street analysts put on the company, there was just no way that eBay could invest anywhere near as much in the payments space as PayPal.  If eBay decided to spend half as much as PayPal did, eBay would have shifted from a $48M profit to a $37M loss -- a move which would have reduced eBay's market capitalization by billions.  Ironically, eBay was sitting on an enormous amount of cash at the time (over $1B) -- especially when compared to PayPal's $61 million cash reserve.  However, the realities of the public markets prevented eBay from spending/investing their cash to remain competitive with PayPal.  The fact that eBay was a publicly traded company forced them into a diferent risk profile when it came to financial investment.   In both of these cases, PayPal was able to pursue a strategy with a different risk profile because they had nothing to lose (except their venture capital investment dollars) and eBay (with their $20 Billion market capitalization) had everything to lose.   So, as I look at the markets today, I think I see a similar situation developing.  There are a large number of public companies that have a lot to lose (and are forced to play defense to protect their sagging stock prices).  As they cut their spending (and lay people off), these companies are slashing investment in new projects and new products.  And that makes them vulnerable to scrappy startups with a different risk profile.  Granted, I don't think you're going to be able to burn through $150M (or even $15M) today to "go big" -- but I believe there are other ways to take an aggressive risk posture (as PayPal did with their willingness to accept legal "ambiguities").  Maybe the fact that startups don't have much to lose is a good thing - especially if you're competing with someone who has a lot to lose. 
 Although the economy is hurting and the markets are in the dumps, we're still investing in new companies and are always eager to meet great new entrepreneurs and startups.  After holding successful office hours in Palo Alto and Vancouver, the First Round Capital team is excited to bring our "Office Hours" to New York City and SXSW (in Texas).   As with all of our office hours meet-ups, this is your chance to meet with the First Round Capital team and chat about anything from starting a new business to joining an existing start-up, in an informal environment.  We’ll be available for a bunch of informal ~10 minute chats. No agenda. We’ll provide the napkins to write on and some drinks while you wait.  In New York, come meet myself, Chris Fralic, Howard Morgan and Phin Barnes in Manhattan on Friday, March 13th at Live Bait Restaurant and Bar from 2-4pm.  Details and signup form can be found here.  At SXSW, come meet Rob Hayes, Kent Goldman and Christine Herron on Monday March 16th at Rio Grande Mexican Restaurant in Austin from 11 am- 1pm.  Details and sigunup form can be found here. 
 I recently returned from the TED conference -- an annual conference that, as they describe it, "brings together the world's most fascinating thinkers and doers…" The speakers at this conference both motivated and scared me. I walked away with a very similar feeling to Rick Smith. And I, like many other people, left the conference motivated to make a positive impact on the world.  But, I'm not likely to develop weapons against drug-resistant superbugs (like Bonnie Basser), to develop new surgical robots (like Catherine Mohr), or prevent pandemics before they happen like epidmiologist (like Nathan Wolfe). I'm just an Internet guy. What can I do?  It was when I heard Tim Berners Lee speak about Linked Data at TED that I had an idea. I've been blogging about the Implict Web for some time now. Specifically, I believe that as people conduct more of their life online, they leave a mountain of digital breadcrumbs (also called data exhaust). Historically, this data has existed in silos. Amazon knows what books I like. Netflix knows what movies I like. OpenTable knows where I eat. But as more website adapt web services and build APIs, this data can be used in new and unexpected ways. And I believe that tremendous value will be created when someone can" cross the silos". Google's PageRank, for example, is a perfect example of data exhaust. It's a set of data (webmasters HTML links) that was created for one purpose, but adds a ton of value when used in a new way (search).  So, here’s my latest hypothesis: I believe that we're rapidly reaching a point where we can learn as much about disease causation by leveraging internet breadcrumbs as we can from traditional medical studies.   For example, there has been an ongoing controversy over whether the use of antiperspirants/deodorants increase the risk of breast cancer. While there have been several studies done to date, the results haven’t provided conclusive data. Indeed, the National Cancer Institute has said: “Because studies of antiperspirants and deodorants and breast cancer have provided conflicting results, additional research is needed to investigate this relationship and other factors that may be involved.”  While I’m not a medical researcher or statistician, I’m amazed about the low sample sizes of these studies. For example, the most recent study cited by the NCI had just 104 people in it. The study before that had only 437 people in it.  What if we asked people to opt-in to participate in a Medical Data Pooling Project?  Users would voluntarily contribute their data exhaust (without any personally identifying information) for medical research.  Every year hundreds of thousands of people support the fight against breast cancer by walking/contributing to walkathons (the Susan G. Komen Walkathon, The Avon Walk for Breast Cancer).  What if we asked them to join a linkathon -- just link your data to this nonprofit medical data pool?  For example, CVS has 50 Million people who have enrolled in Extracare (their loyalty program). I sure bet a lot of them are women who buy deodorant at CVS.  And if you don’t shop at CVS, you probably buy deodorant at a supermarket that has a loyalty program (most likely run by Catalina Marketing). What if a researcher was able access this global consumption data and target a segment of the population (say, 50,000 women above the age of 40 who buy deodorant 4 times a year or more, for example) and then survey them about their medical history? The ability to link to consumption to medical condition would be extremely valuable. The power of this linkage could be immense.  Take the debate over whether the chemicals used in dry cleaners (PERC) cause cancer. With over 600,000 users tracking their expenses, I’m sure that Mint.com would be an invaluable data set for medical researchers. Want to study if prolonged cell phone usage causes cancer? Skydeck collects your cell phone usage data.  Convincing users to anonymously part with their data and answer some medical questions is not going to be easy...BUT, it should be a lot easier than convincing them to participate in clinical trials.  Current non-profits could be enlisted to get their membership to participate (ie, it might be easier to get someone to donate their data exhaust than to give money or participate in a fundraiser).  And I have to think that the database providers would love this -- after all, this would (1) potentially encourage more consumers to participate, (2) benefit society and (3) provide them with a compelling argument to all those people who oppose database marketing.  Anyone up to working on this with me? What am I missing? 
 The other day I read The Giving Tree to my son as I was tucking him in to bed.  I remembered the book from when I was a kid.    The book tells the tale of a relationship between a boy and a tree.  In the early days, the relationship is wonderful.  The boy and the tree are great friends – and the boy enjoys climbing the tree’s trunk, swinging from it's branches, eating its bountiful apples, and sleeping in it’s shade.  But then time passes.  And as the boy gets older, the relationship changes.  The boy comes back to the tree when he needs money, and the tree gives him its apples to sell in the city.  Years pass.  The boy needs a house, and the tree gives him its branches to build a house.  Years pass.  The boy wants a boat, and the tree gives him its trunk to make a boat.  The boy returns one more time, this time as an old man.  And the tree, which is now just a stump, has nothing more to offer him.  But all the man wants to do is sit down to rest.  And he sits on the stump...    Many people have written about the book, and there is much debate as to whether the tree is "selfless or merely self-sacrificing, and whether the boy is selfish or reasonable in his demands of the tree".  As I finished the book and put my son to bed, a thought hit me.  We’re watching a real-time unfolding of The Giving Tree right now.  It’s called the implosion of the NY Times.  In this story, the role of the boy is played by the Internet...   In the Internet's youth, it looks up to the big tree (the NY Times) -- and they play nicely together and become friends.  But, the tree didn't understand the true cost of a friendship with the boy.  And as time passes, the NY Times is going to be forced by the Internet to sell it’s building.  It will sell it’s stake in the Boston Red Sox.  It will ultimately sell it's stake in the Boston Globe and About.com.  It will charge a subscription for web users.  And in the end, the New York Times will just be a stump.     It may be a few years off, but I'm pretty sure I will be reading the "NY Times Edition" of the Giving Tree in the next few years.  But in the meanwhile, it does provide a cautionary tale about disruptive technology.  And all CEO's around the world should ask themselves:  Does my company have any relationships (with other companies -- or with new technologies) that are starting off friendly (and mutually beneficial) but could evolve to be one-sided?  
 It was sometime in August when I first saw the Where The Hell Is Matt video. It had just gone viral, and unlike most other "viral videos", I thought Matt's video was moving, fun and uplifting -- it was a great way to showcase the differences and similarities between 40+ different countries.  Then I had the idea. What if we filmed a similar video with our 40+ portfolio companies. And thus began the quest to film our holiday video. My partners and I kept our Flip cameras in our briefcases, and starting in August, whenever we went to visit our portfolio companies we invoked the "dancing" clause in the term sheet. As you can see, we all had a blast.  And then the market crashed. My partners and I discussed scrapping our little holiday project. But the more we talked about it, the more we were convinced that we should continue. While our companies were all facing up to the new realities -- and in some cases, making some tough choices -- it didn't mean that they couldn't take 15 seconds to have some fun. In times of adversity, maintaining perspective and an espirit-de-corps is even more important than ever.  I look forward to "keeping on my toes" this year with all of you. Best wishes for a happy and healthy holiday season -- and let's hope we all have something to dance about next year... 
 As we've grown First Round Capital over the last several years, I've come to believe that there are three types of value-add that venture capital firms can add to portfolio companies.   The first is the money.  There is no differentation or value-add here.  Every investor's money is the same.  The second is the value that the specific people (partners, principals, associates) at a venture firm add.  Let's call it "people" value.  Can your VC help you with your distribution strategy?  Can they help you build your team?  Can they connect you with a partner?  This value is dependent on the skills and rolodex of the particular VC that a startup is working with -- as well as the amount of time they can allocate to your company.  The third level of value is what I call "structural" value.  This is the value that the firm can bring outside of any specific partner interaction -- it is scaleable, institutional value-add.  While I think that my colleagues and I add a tremendous amount of "people value", we really spend a great amount of effort trying to add structural value to our portfolio companies.  This is why we hold our annual CEO Summit - which has featured speakers from Corporate Development at major Internet players (such as Google, Yahoo, AOL, CBS, Microsoft, and Fox Interactive), Bloggers and press (like Michael Arrington and Henry Blodget), evangelists from up-and-coming platforms (like Facebook and Amazon), and valley veterans (like Marc Andreessen).  It's why we have operate a well-used mailing list for our portfolio company CEO's and CTO's to share best practices and ask each other for assistance.   And it's why we just completed our "First Round Capital Agency Days" in New York City this week.   As we worked with our portfolio companies, one of the things we’ve been hearing loud and clear is that our advertising-related companies would like to have deeper relationships with large ad agencies.   So this week my partner, Chris Fralic, organized a two-day road trip to the four largest advertising agencies in country.  We rented a bus, and drove our companies to meet with WPP, Digitas, OMG and Universal McCann.  This gave our portfolio companies the opportunity to present to over 100 media buyers, account executives and strategists.  These four agencies control a major portion of total US ad spending.  The response was so strong that we’re going to do it again in the spring.    Thanks to all the companies (below) and agencies for making the event so successful -- and Chris for organizing a wonderful event! 
 Mashery, will be hosting their third annual Business of APIs conference, coming up on Monday, November 3rd in San Francisco.   As its name suggests, "The Business of APIs" is not a technical conference. It is a place where the people responsible for bringing in revenue, building traffic or building content syndication channels will learn how some of the most prominent and successful media and internet companies are enjoying significant growth through building a web services distribution channel.  In this one-day conference you will learn from companies that have executed API strategies to reinvent their businesses. They will share why and how they did it, what they expected to achieve, and how they are measuring success. It will be a day of real-world advice and lessons learned from many of your peers who are already part of the Web's Industrial Revolution.  Confirmed speakers include:  Heidi Tucker, VP of Business Development, Hoover's Marc Frons, CTO, New York Times Mike Hart, Director of Engineering, Web API, Netflix Daniel Jacboson, Manager of Application Development, NPR Digital Media Clay Webster, Associate Vice President Platform Infrastructure, CBS Interactive Michele Azar, Vice President of Emerging Channels, Best Buy Allen Hurff, Senior Vice President of Engineering, MySpace Aaron Patzer, Founder & CEO, Mint.com Quentin Hardy, Sr Editor and Silicon Valley Bureau Chief, Forbes This is only a partial list of speakers; more will be announced in the coming days. Information about the conference can be found at: http://www.apiconference.com  Use the discount "BAPI" code and register for only $199 - a savings of 33%! 
 We live in interesting times.   Despite the recent doom and gloom forecasts for startup companies, we at First Round Capital are still investing in new companies and actively seeking talented entrepreneurs to back.  My colleagues on the west coast are holding our first Office Hours next Tuesday.  As Kent wrote in his blog post:  "At Office Hours, we’d love to meet with entrepreneurs, people thinking about becoming entrepreneurs or folks who would like join a start-up. We’ll be available for a bunch of informal ~15 minute chats. There’s no agenda. Ask us what we think of the market environment or share an idea for a company – we’ll be sure to have plenty of napkins available to help draft that first product plan. We’ll listen, share our perspective and pay for the coffee (which may be of more value than our advice).  When: Tuesday, October 21st , 11am – 1pm Where: University Café, 271 University Ave, Palo Alto, CA 94301  All are welcome -- if you think you'll drop by, please RSVP, so they can get a sense of how many people are coming.   I'll be in town that week, so I'll be there from 11 until noon... 
 For years, one of the biggest challenges facing New York city based startup companies has been the competition for technical talent.   It was very difficult for a venture-backed startup to compete with the compensation packages offered by the big investment banks.  Stock options had a hard-time overcoming oversized cash bonuses.  While no one is happy with the turmoil we're seeing facing the financial services sector, and no one is happy to see mass layoffs, this does represent an opportunity for startup companies to attract seasoned, technical talent.  With Bear Stearns laying off over 7,000 employees, Lehman Brothers rumored to layoff over 20,000 employees, and Merrill Lynch expected to layoff thousands after their sale to Bank of America, we're on track to see over 150,000 people lose their jobs this year.  If you are one of those 150,000 employees, you might want to consider joining a startup.  These days, startups are more stable than Wall Street (seriously).  And while a startup probably won't offer the creature comforts of a job in the financial services industry, startups offer different benefits.  You get to participate in the creation of something new.  Your work makes a direct (and clear) impact on the success or failure of the company.  No more politics, endless meetings, or multi-layered organization structures.  Plus, you'll likely get stock options to share the upside.  That's why I launched LeaveWallStreetJoinAStartup.com -- a website highlighting great job opportunities at NY-area startup companies.  If you're looking for a job in NY city, check it out.  If you're a startup looking for talent, send me your job postings at jobs@leavewallstreetjoinastartup.com and I'll add it to the list...  
 About 10 years ago, I helped create a web service called Company Sleuth.  The basic premise was that as a company conducted its business activities, it would leave a "paper trail" online.  And Company Sleuth tried to find that trail by automatically searching a variety of public databases (such as the US patent database, trademark database, domain registrations, job listings, etc.) for "clues" about all US public companies activities.  Users would tell Company Sleuth the companies they cared about and receive a daily email containing a list of all new "clues" that were found.  The service found some interesting data.  For example, while in beta we saw that the domain name "daimlerchrysler.com" was registered by Skadden Arps (Daimler's law firm) days before the deal was announced.  And we also noticed that MCI Worldcom registered skytelworldcom.com just days before they announced their merger, causing their stock to jump 16% and  prompting an SEC investigation.     Unfortunately, Company Sleuth is no longer around (although I found an old version of the site on archive.org).  Last month I blogged about the Reg D and stealth mode.  And after I wrote the post, I got to thinking:  Why not create a tool that checked the SEC database every night for changes on the companies I'm interested in?  While the SEC doesn't provide you the details on the financing (amount, investor, etc), at least I can know if financing activity took place.  So I went to Rentacoder.com, got connected with m4k3r (a developer in Australia).  A few days (and $200) later, I had a tool built that would check the SEC Database for me.  Rather than keep this to myself, I've decided to open up the site to anyone.  So today I'm announcing the launch of  FundingSleuth.com.   Read about an interesting new company on Techcrunch?  Want to see if your competitor raised money?  Add the company to your list at  FundingSleuth.com  and you'll receive an email whenever there is funding activity.   Let me know what you think...  
 I've been going to the TED conference for almost 10 years now -- and I've seen hundreds of incredible speakers take the stage.  Last year, Benjamin Zander - the conductor of the Boston Philharmonic, gave what I think is one of the best talks of all time.  Zander is the Steve Jobs of classical music.    An online video of his talk was just released this week.  Ostensibly, his talk was about classical music.  But, in reality, Zander shows how in just twenty minutes one can expose people to new ideas, new possibilities and new passions.  He truly embodies his belief that "one of the characteristics of a leader is that he not doubt for one moment the capacity of the people he's leading to realize whatever he's dreaming".  I especially liked his realization that since the conductor of an orchestra doesn't make a sound, he depends for his power on his ability to make other people powerful.  His job is to awaken possibility in other people.    Take 20 minutes out of your day today and watch this talk.   You'll see an moving example of leadership, evangelism and passion.  And see how a leader can make your "eyes shine".  
 I recently received Predictably Irrational by Dan Arielly from the TED book club -- and highly recommend it.  Dan does a powerful job of convincing us that (1) People are not as rational (or smart) in making decisions as they think, and (2) The mistakes and errors that we make are systemic and predictable.  Thus, we are predictably irrational.  Chapter Three was especially interesting to me, as Arielly describes an experiment which proves my "Penny Gap" theory.  (A copy of the experiment is available on his website here.)    And for anyone trying to decide how to price an online service, I'd strongly recommend the first chapter -- which discusses the importance of setting relative context for price/value determination.  (An excerpt from this chapter is available here.)  
 About a year ago, right after Facebook launched its Platform, I started telling my wife about Facebook.  She didn't get it.  While she understood how it could be useful to college kids, she just didn't understand how it could be relevant/useful to adults.  In order to show her the benefits of the site, I set up a Facebook account for her.  But given her predisposition, my expectations for her longevity on Facebook were very low.  Surprisingly, however, my wife started to use the site.  She slowly but surely connected with old friends from grade school, summer camp and college.  She connected online with our neighbors and parents of our kids' friends.  She started playing Scrabulous with her mother and sister.  She even started updating her Facebook Status.  She now has over 250 friends on the site, and it's part of her daily routine.  This past week has been a really bad week for us.  On Saturday, I learned that my Grandmother passed away.  On Sunday morning, our seven-year old daughter awoke with sharp pain in the lower right-hand corner of her stomach.  Fearing appendicitis, we took her to the hospital, and they operated.  Her recovery took longer than expected -- and she was in the hospital for six days.  I canceled my calls and meetings and basically disconnected from the Internet for the week.  The only hint I gave was a brief Twitter message.  My wife also cleared her calendar -- but she provided some Facebook updates about the situation.  And what happened next really amazed me.  Her phone started ringing with calls of support and help.  Friends offered to pick-up and drop-off our son at school.  Home-cooked dinners arrived at our house.  Balloons, stuffed animals, and cards arrived at the hospital room.  Old friends from high school and college called her saying that they were there to listen if she wanted to vent or talk.  Her brief Facebook status update was all it took to activate her real-world support network.  It was incredible.    Last week (just hours before this whole ordeal began) I wrote a post about the "Atomization of Conversation" in which I worried about the effects of asynchronous communication resulting from things like Twitter and Facebook Status updates.    However, after witnessing how a 90-character update can unleash such a torrent of concern, support and love -- I now know we have nothing to fear from the atomization of conversation.  Rather, it's just the opposite.  As tools get created to atomize our interactions, they provide a much easier, much faster way for us to react to the events in others' lives.  My daughter is home recovering -- and I'm going to go play with her now... 
 If someone was to put together the "Founder's Manual" for pitching a VC, the section on barriers to entry would say something like: "When asked about your barrier to entry, tell the VC that you have several patents pending for proprietary technology."   Heck, I'm sure I used the same line when I was raising money for Half.com -- after all, we filed for our first patent in October 1999.    Well, I'm excited to announce that the original Half.com patent (#7,373,317) was finally approved by the USPTO last week - eight and a half years after we filed it (and seven years after eBay acquired Half.com).    Most people don't realize that the average software patent will take many  years from initial application to issuance.  (According to the USPTO, software patents have the longest backlog of any type of patent.  In 2005 the backlog was almost four years...and it has grown larger since then).   Given that a patent needs to be issued before it can be enforced, and given that it takes 4+ years for a patent to issue, you can't really call it an effective "barrier" to entry.  Before you can even consider enforcing the patent, your company has already succeeded or failed in the marketplace.  And by the time you try to close the "patent door" to the barn, the horse has not only left the barn, it has probably died of old age.    I believe there is little-to-no value in depending on pending patents for a "barrier" to entry.    So should startups invest in patents?  I agree with much of what Brad Feld writes in his AskTheVC post on this topic - especially his conclusion that pending "patents are probably the most overvalued 'asset' that startups promote when raising funds".  [UPDATE:  Brad has a great post today on IP protection]  There is value in owning issued patents -- but that typically comes after you've experienced success in the marketplace.  (If a company has failed in the marketplace, their patent filing is typically abandoned/withdrawn).  I think Fred Wilson said it best when he said "Patents are like nuclear bombs, you just got to have some".  But if you're fighting a war today, it's better to count on weapons you have at hand today -- don't rely on a nuclear program that could take five years to come to fruition.   You can't keep competitors out of your market just by depending on something that's still pending... 
 I've written frequently about my thoughts on the Implicit Web.  As more consumers spend more time online (and perform more of their activities online), they leave a trail of digital breadcrumbs exposing data about themselves and their interests.  This "digital exhaust' is often massive -- requiring terabytes of data and log files.  And while storage costs are coming way down, it is still typically too expensive for companies to analyze all their historical data.  Instead, companies frequently resort to sampling or archiving.  And for those companies that do try to retain and analyze historical data, they typically find that their database queries take hours or days.  That's why I'm so excited that First Round Capital portfolio company, Aster Data Systems, has launched today -- after three years in stealth mode.  Google and Yahoo power their sites using databases distributed across many clusters of servers.  Aster Data offers clustered databases for web analytics -- and today announced that they are already supporting Myspace (which is running a 100 server node cluster across hundreds of terabytes) and Aggregate Knowledge's Pique service (which is performing analysis on over 100 million users).    As more companies seek to transform their data exhaust into data value (hey wait a minute -- perhaps that's the Web 2.0 version of "clean tech" -- converting messy data into clean insight) -- I think they will need tools like Aster Data to help them discover deep insights on massive data sets.  More information on Aster can be found on their website and blog. 
 While the blogosphere buzzes about Facebook's banning of Google Friend Connect, it appears that Google is not entirely a "persona non grata" at Facebook.  It seems that Google, the Internet advertising superpower, is actually purchasing advertising on Facebook's Ad Platform.  As you can see from this ad (right) from Facebook, Google is seeking candidates for their User Experience Research.    Maybe Google wanted to test out Facebook's social ad targeting platform.  Or maybe they just wanted to recruit the candidates outside of the Google footprint.  Either way, I'm glad to see the two companies getting along ;-)  Oh -- and you can check out more information on Google's User Experience Research program here and here. 
 Last week I was speaking with Lawrence Hooper of Loladex and he used a phrase that's been sticking in my head.  When I asked him whether people would be willing to solicit their friends to make a local recommendations via his Facebook application -- he said how he believed his site represented the continued "atomization of conversations."  It's interesting to think about -- as more applications get connected to the social graph, conversation and dialog are being atomized.  If the current "geek" technologies go mainstream, you will no longer need to have a broad conversation about anything.   Why call someone and tell them you're coming to town?  They've seen it on Dopplr.  Want to tell someone about your recent trip to England?  Don't bother, they've seen the pictures on Flickr.  No need to call me and ask whether the new movie I just saw is any good -- you've seen my review on Flickster.  Want to know what music I'm listening to right now? -- check out iLike. Is someone you know suffering from an illness or injury? -- stay connected and informed (and offer support) at their Carepage.  Did your friend just open a bottle of wine?  You can stay up to date on what they like (and don't) by following their CellarTracker reviews. And if that didn't cover it, don't worry, you probably saw it in my Facebook Status updates or Twitter feed.  Conversations are indeed becoming atomized and asynchronous.  No need for the "Hey, how are you doing?" discussion.  Personal dialog is being replaced by a Mini-feed.    Pro - David Levine says it best "Atomization means conversations are more powerful and real ones have more true content."  Con - There's something special and genuine about a conversation -- the anecdotes, personality and emotion don't come across the same in a 160 character SMS message.   
 I just returned from participating on the Churchill Club's annual "Top Ten Tech Trends" panel.  Quite an amazing event -- they pick five VC's for the panel and each gets to present (and defend) two trends for the coming year.  With a panel consisting of Khosla, Jurvetson, Schoendorf, McNamee and Kopelman, I felt a little like I was part of a "Which One Of These Things is Not Like The Other" puzzle...but overall I think I did OK for a "rookie".  (I discussed the Implicit Web and a pending shakeout in VC as my two top trends).  A good summary of the event and all 10 trends can be found here, here and here.    Oh, and while I know I have no chance of becoming an "A List" blogger, it appears that I've made the B-Z List.  (Or at least according to The Industry Standard). 
 I recently blogged about the importance of conducting a cohort analysis to track user retention.   A good cohort analysis helps you understand how many customers you keep and how many you lose.  So now what?  I'm surprised how little pro-active messaging/communication most Internet companies do.  And if they do send me an email, it tends to be a generic weekly promotional email that they send to all users.  One thing that I learned at half.com is the importance of lifecycle messaging -- in which you deliver different messages to different users based on where they are in their lifecycle.  Some examples:  The average fiction book is read within two weeks of purchase.  So if you purchased a John Grisham book for $8.75 on Half.com, chances are that you will finish it within 14 days.  We decided to implement an auto-email that was sent 17 days after purchase that said "Want your $8.75 back, click here to list your Grisham book for sale".  We found that the open (and conversion) rate of that email was amazing -- and it greatly added to our ability to "turn" the same book multiple times. We noticed on our cohort analysis that if a first-time buyer did not make a second-purchase within 6 weeks of their initial purchase, there was a 80%+ chance that they would not return -- but that if a user made two purchases within that period of time, there was a 70+% chance they would return again.  So we created an auto-email with a personalized, limited-time coupon that was sent after six weeks.  Again, we experienced strong open/conversion rates. We noticed that if a buyer left negative feedback on a transaction it had a definite impact on their repeat purchase behavior -- so we created a customized email campaign towards those users. Like all e-commerce sites, Half.com had many "abandonded shopping carts" -- where people would put items in the cart and not check out.  We created an auto-email campaign that would merchandise the items left in the cart -- and send it out two hours after the cart was abandoned.  A very successful campaign. And while these are examples of lifecycle messaging by email -- you can do the same thing on the site as well.  Many sites still display the same homepage for first-time and repeat users.  The leading e-commerce sites added personalized home-pages long ago -- so they can deliver different messages to new users (education, introduction, tutorials) and to repeat users (personalized recommendations, promotions).  If you'd like to see a good example, go to eBay as an existing user -- then delete your eBay cookies from your browser and return.  Conducting a cohort analysis is just the first step towards increasing user retention and activity levels.  Once you have your cohort analysis, you then should look at ways to systematically reduce churn and increase user satisfaction - by finding the key "touchpoints" which can dramatically change the course of a user's experience.  This is not rocket science, but despite the fact that Jupiter Research data indicates that lifecycle marketing campaigns generate as much as nine times greater results, few marketers are taking advantage of this strategy to deliver the right message at the right time.      My co-founder at Half.com, Sunny Balijapalli, has recently started a new company (Zoomin.com - which was rated the #1 photo sharing and printing service in India by PC World) that First Round Capital has funded.  Not surprisingly, one of his first priorities was to put together a lifecycle messaging program.  With his permission, I've attached a copy of his program overview here.  A small digression.  The current issue of Wired Magazine discusses the "spacing effect" for human learning -- which recognizes that if a person is reminded of a fact at certain specified intervals, they are far more likely to remember the fact later.  (See chart below from Wired).  I think the metaphor can be extended to consumer marketing as well -- if you communicate with a user during certain specific intervals, they are far more likely to return to the site later.  They key is to figure out what those intervals are -- and what "triggers" you should use to drive the communication. 
 I just read Fred Wilson's blog post about the need to ask for the order.  I completely agree -- if you don't ask, you don't get.    However, I believe that there are different ways to ask for the same order.  And the way that you ask can either increase or decrease the odds of a successful outcome.  Some examples:  Before we launched Half.com, we knew that we needed to have a lot of  inventory on the site -- so we reached out to dozens of used bookstores, CD stores and video shops.  We had a team of three business development people working full-time to get these sellers to agree to list on our site.  Initially, we would call a prospective seller, explain our site/model, and if they were interested, we'd "ask for the order" and send them our standard three-page seller agreement.  Despite our best efforts, we found that small retailers were either intimidated by our agreement or didn't want to spend the money to have a lawyer review it. More than 60% of the interested sellers would drop out of the process before they signed the agreement.  We then made a slight change.  Instead of sending them a three-page legal agreement to physically sign, we added a click-wrap agreement to our site.  We then asked the sellers to register online, and during registration we simply asked the seller to agree to our terms of service by clicking a box.  Instantly, we eliminated our biggest challenge in getting sellers on board.  Because in this case, users are far more willing to agree to terms on a website than they are to sign a three-page contract.  We didn't change what we asked for -- we just changed the way we asked for it.  One of my portfolio companies recently experienced the same thing.  They were talking with a variety of prospects about a big advertising deal.  And initially my company was sending out an "Advertising Partnership Agreement" -- outlining the full terms of the relationship.  They quickly learned that all  non-standard agreements had to go to legal -- which added weeks/months to the process.    So the company decided to try a change.  Instead of sending over a custom agreement, they sent over benign looking  "Ad Insertion Agreement" which had the exact same terms of our prior agreement.  Our marketing contact had full authority to sign an ad insertion agreement -- they do that all day long -- and now my company is able to get deals signed much faster by changing the format of our "ask".  The list continues.  When TurnTide wanted to send out a free evaluation unit of their anti-spam router, they originally had a long written agreement.  When they changed the format of their agreement to a one-page trial acceptance form, they cut weeks off their sales cycle.    Say you work at Google and you want to get a prospective partner to sign an NDA.  You can send someone your NDA document and it goes to their lawyer.  There will probably be a bunch of back-and-forth on the terms.  That's pretty time consuming.  However, why not do it the easy way?  Just invite the guy over to lunch on Google's campus.    Because whenever anyone gets a visitor badge at Google they are asked to sign an NDA as part of their visitor badge process.   I'm sure glad everyone brings a lawyer to help them sign-in at reception ;-)  The way you ask is just as important as asking.  If you focus on reducing friction in a transaction -- and ask for the order in the right way -- you might find that you improve both your odds of success and the time needed to get a deal done... 
 Think you're pretty smart?  Prove it.  Tomorrow night, Playcafe.com (a First Round Capital portfolio company) will be hosting Ken Jennings.  Ken is the guy who won 74 games in a row (and over $3 million) on Jeopardy.  But on Jeopardy Ken only had to beat two other players a night.  On Monday night, Ken will be playing against the world.  Playcafe is a recent First Round Capital investment that is creating the first online game show network. Traditional game shows such as "Deal or No Deal" and "One vs. 100" are among the most popular programs on TV (nine of the top 20 shows, 200 million viewers) but they weakly implement a game's two most important traits - interactivity and socialness.  PlayCafe is creating a platform to stream in-house and user-generated game shows that let every viewer be a contestant.  While I've previously written about the importance of admitting what you don't know, tomorrow night is all about proving what you do know.  Give PlayCafe.com a try tomorrow night, this Monday, April 28th from 6:00-8:00 pm (PDT).   Who knows, you might beat Ken. 
 I've been thinking a lot about age recently.  As my age catches up to my rapidly graying hair, I'm realizing that I'm no longer the youngest guy in the room...  Today, Business Week released their list of "Tech's Best Young Entrepreneurs", where they highlight eleven "of the tech industry's most promising players aged 30 and under...whose ideas and innovations are likely to make the biggest impact on technology in the coming years."    While I have always said that my fund, First Round Capital, seeks to invest in incredible entrepreneurs, I was amazed to learn that we had funded 4 of the 11 finalists.  So, while I'm still coping with the fact that I'm too old to make any "young" list myself, I can take comfort in the fact that we had backed more than a third of the finalists.  
 As a Pennsylvania resident, I was really surprised by today's announcement from portfolio company, Jingle Networks.  The company, which operates the country's largest free 411 service (1-800-FREE-411), recently conducted a political poll.  Now this was not your typical poll.  Typical polls contact just 500 - 1,000 people.  Because Jingle gets calls from almost 20 million callers a month, they were quickly able to poll 24,000 likely voters in Pennsylvania.  This makes it one of the largest samples ever used in a political poll -- with an error level of less than one percent.  And the results were pretty surprising.  Among those making a choice, the results show Barack Obama leading Hillary Clinton by 57 percent vs 43 percent.  These results are strikingly different from traditional polls (for example, a recent LA Times / Bloomberg poll shows Clinton ahead in PA by 5%).  George Garrick, Jingle's CEO, comments that "a key factor contributing to error in poll predictions is the undecided voter sector. In Pennsylvania, 25 percent of voters are still saying they are "undecided" and that could easily produce a last minute turnaround from one candidate to the other since the undecided sector is larger than the differences being cited in any of the polls. If the small sample size used in a typical poll does not perfectly represent the larger population, it's possible to see a very different result in the actual vote. That's why using a significantly larger than normal sample size is interesting."  It's always neat to see new technologies used in unanticipated ways... 
 Over the last several years, April Fool's Day has been moving online – and although we’ve seen online pranks from startups, bloggers, and large Internet companies, I’ve noticed relatively few from venture capitalists.  (Insert sarcastic comment about VC’s lack of sense of humor here).  So, I thought I’d try to join in this year.    One of the investment themes we’ve been following this past year is the rapid growth of user-generated content.  And a creative example of user-generated content in the venture industry is TheFunded.com – a site where entrepreneurs can leave anonymous feedback about their experiences with venture capitalists.  So, I thought it would be fitting to launch TheUNFunded.com for April Fools – a site for VC’s to provide anonymous feedback on entrepreneurs.  I intentionally wrote such outlandish reviews of fake entrepreneurs, and I expected everyone to immediately realize it was a joke.    Michael Arrington “broke the story” about TheUnFunded.com yesterday on Techcrunch, and the site quickly benefited from the Techcrunch Bump.   And while my little prank surely won’t make the 100 Top April Fools Day Hoaxes of all time, the responses provided an interesting perspective on people’s attitudes (and predispositions) towards the venture industry.  While there were several people who recognized the April Fool's Day satire, I was surprised to see that many people assumed the site was real.  And their reactions on Techcrunch and blog posts were very revealing.  Heck, even VentureBeat (which covers the venture industry professionally) fell for it.  My favorite reaction comes from a del.icio.us user who tagged the site as “Funding, VC, Douchebags”.  The fact that so many smart people actually believed that such an outlandish site could be legitimate speaks volumes about the state of the relationship between entrepreneurs and venture capitalists.  Today's New York Times has a story which notes that "...recent research suggests that the experience of being duped can stir self-reflection in a way few other experiences can..."  And while I don’t want to read too much into a silly April Fool’s Day joke, I think it does shine a little light on the level of mistrust and ignorance within the VC/entrepreneur ecosystem.  I don’t know if I am more surprised by the fact that entrepreneurs fell for the hoax – or that the site received over thirty membership requests from legitimate VCs.   (Don’t worry guys, I won’t publish your submissions – just make sure you mark up my next hot deal;-)  Just to be clear, TheUnFunded was a joke.  A parody.  No actual entrepreneurs or companies were reviewed on the site.  I genuinely like TheFunded.com – and think it provides some much needed transparency in the venture industry.  No hidden message here -- just a recognition that sometimes everyone takes themselves a little too seriously...  Now that April Fools is past, I’ll be shutting down TheUnFunded.com later this week, and giving the domain to Adeo at TheFunded to use as he sees fit.  Thanks to both Michael and Adeo for playing along…  
 I don't know.  Why is it so hard for people (including both entrepreneurs and VCs) to say these three words?  This past week I had two distinctly different meetings with entrepreneurs.  They both were successful serial entrepreneurs.  Both were exceptionally smart.  Both had good ideas.  The first entrepreneur, however, thought that they were expected to know the answer to every question.  There wasn't a question I asked that he didn't have a definitive answer to.  He knew what their pricing model would be.  He knew why Google would never compete with them.  He knew what their consumer churn would be three years out (despite the fact that they hadn't launched yet).  Whenever I tried to discuss the different risks in the business, he told me why they didn't exist.    The second entrepreneur, had a different approach.  He definitively stated answers when he had them, but when he didn't know he said so.  When asked about his pricing model, he said "well, we're considering a few different options depending on the outcome of some tests we're running..."  When asked about cost of customer acquisition, he said "well we don't know what our numbers will be...but here's our model based on other comparable companies."  When asked about risks, he identified several -- and then we discussed how to reduce/eliminate them.  I've come to believe that a key investment criteria is founder credibility.  And, I think the second entrepreneur was far more credible.  No one expects a pre-launch company to have all the answers.  (In fact, we get scared if you think you have them).  As I've previously discussed, rather than have an entrepreneur sell me on why they are 100% correct, I'd much rather understand how they are attacking the different risks facing the business.  And, by the way, the same applies for venture capitalists.  I often feel that during company pitches -- and board of directors meetings -- we're expected to have an immediate opinion.  Should we double our marketing budget?  Should I hire this person?  Will this strategy work?  While it's OK to offer opinions and thoughts, I think it is also appropriate to acknowledge uncertainty.      Why do people feel pressure to have an answer for every answer?  I don't know... 
 Back in the early 90's, I co-founded a company called Infonautics that ran an online service called Homework Helper.  It operated on Prodigy and AOL -- a few years before the development of the web browser.  We ran our own data center (the Rackspaces of the world didn't exist) and staffed our network operations team 24x7.  I remember being amazed by the network operator's job.  Given the complexity of the system, the network operator would receive dozens of emails per hour, informing him of the status of the various systems and components.  Emails with subjects like "Server load at 87%" and "Query queue at 43" or "Warning: Disk space on Server43 at 95%".  Most of those emails didn't require action, but the network operator had to review them all in order to find the important ones.  In a typical day, I'd guess the netops desk received 2,000 - 4,000 email updates.  By the time I left Infonautics in 1998, the system had evolved.  Instead of the systems reporting to a human via email, we adopted a SNMP dashboard.  This was a piece of software that automatically received (and sometimes acted on) data from the different systems (such as "free memory", "system name", "number of running processes", "default route").  And this level of reporting (and the ability to act on it) eliminated the need for a night-shift network operator.  Fast forward a decade to 2008.  Over the last six months, it seems like every web site is adopting the notion of a "News Feed".  These feeds keep me informed about the status/actions of all my friends and relationships.  I have a Facebook News Feed.  I have a Twitter Feed.  I have a LinkedIn Feed.  And even more recently, a new category of products called Feed Aggregators have arrived.  These aggregators, such as FriendFeed and SocialThing, allow you to track your feeds across multiple sites.  There has even been a spoof site that aggregates the aggregators.  I love the concept of the News Feed.  I think it is an early implementation of the Implict Web, helping to break down the data silos.  However, I'm now receiving hundreds of feed updates a day.  And with the combination of (1) more users activating feeds and (2) more web sites offering them, I think that feed volume is poised to increase exponentially.  And I can sense that, just like at Infonautics in 1994, the volume will increase to a level that will require 24 hour vigilence to remain informed.    So, the question I've been thinking a lot about lately is:  What happens next?  How does the feed concept scale -- without forcing people to hire their own netops team to watch the feed.  And I've come to two rough conclusions:  1.  Feeds 2.0 = the feed dashboard  Just like SNMP allowed us to build an automated dashboard to monitor the status of different connected devices, I think it's logical to assume that web services will develop to allow us to monitor the status of connected people.  I'm not talking about a chronological data dump of text like the current 1.0 feed aggregators.  I think there will be applications which aggregate, interpret, and act on feeds.  This dashboard will collect the thousands of feed emails, and determine which require action, which are important, and provide the user with a level of abstraction that currently is not there.  2.  Walmart wants to be your friend  As I've been thinking about the Implict Web, I've seen a variety of technologies/standards (such as APML, Microformats, OpenId, Data Portability, OpenSocial) that are intended to help webservices talk with each other -- and break down the data silos.  However, I think we might get surprised here.  I think the real challenge with respect to the implict (or semantic) web is not technical.  Rather, it has to do with educating (and empowering) the user so they understand the privacy and control issues related to cross-application data sharing.   And as more and more applications export events into News Feeds, I think we might find that the News Feed becomes a standard for cross-application information delivery.  Rather than trying to build semantic intent into a website or webservice, could we be better off collecting it from the news feeds?  Data is structured in a fairly standard format.  And most importantly, user permissioning and privacy controls are already built into newsfeeds.  Users understand the issue/decision involved in "Bob wants to be your friend".  Is it such a big leap for people to receive "Walmart wants to be your friend" or "Amazon wants to be your friend"?  If web sites -- rather than people -- were subscribers of my news feed, that would break down a whole bunch of silos.  Amazon already knows how to take advantage of it's onsite user activity to enrich a customer's experience.  But if it can figure out how to utilize a user's offsite activity -- wow!  And privacy is still in the consumers hand -- just like how today I control (1) what goes into my feed and (2) who receives it.  If this vision comes to fruition, I think there the big opportunity is not for the company (or companies) that collects and distributes the feeds.  But rather, the big opportunity is for the company (or companies) that can turn the data into actionable, useful information.     I'd love to hear your thoughts on this.  (And if there are any companies that are working to create the "SNMP for feeds", please contact me!) 
 This month's issue of Wired Magazine contains a great cover story by Chris Anderson titled "Free! Why $0.00 Is the Future of Business"    I think Chris does a wonderful job describing the rise of "freeconomics"  -- and is a must read for people thinking of shrinking a market.  It even contains a nice summary of my "Penny Gap" post:  From the consumer's perspective, though, there is a huge difference between cheap and free. Give a product away and it can go viral. Charge a single cent for it and you're in an entirely different business, one of clawing and scratching for every customer. The psychology of "free" is powerful indeed, as any marketer will tell you.  This difference between cheap and free is what venture capitalist Josh Kopelman calls the "penny gap." People think demand is elastic and that volume falls in a straight line as price rises, but the truth is that zero is one market and any other price is another. In many cases, that's the difference between a great market and none at all.  The huge psychological gap between "almost zero" and "zero" is why micropayments failed. It's why Google doesn't show up on your credit card. It's why modern Web companies don't charge their users anything. And it's why Yahoo gives away disk drive space. The question of infinite storage was not if but when. The winners made their stuff free first.  It appears that "FREE" will be the title of Chris Anderson's new book, due out in 2009.  I'm going to place my pre-order today.   
 If this post from ComparisonEngines.com is correct, Amazon is launching something big -- ProductAds.  Instead of trying to capture all ecommerce transactions on the Amazon.com platform or marketplace, Amazon is now referring transactions to other non-Amazon merchants.  Basically, Amazon.com is becoming a comparison shopping engine.    Perhaps this is a result from Amazon's recognition that "the percentage of shoppers who started at Amazon has continued to fall, while the percentage of consumers who say they start shopping at a search portal has risen."   Given that ecommerce search represents a big portion of Google's Adwords revenue -- and almost 100% of eBay's revenue -- if this takes off, it could have a pretty big impact on the ecommerce world.  
 Wow.  My post yesterday got a lot of attention.  Techmeme for most of the day.  And nice compliments from Fred, Bijan and Alley Insider.  Unfortunately, I probably should have named my post "How to lose fans and (falsely) influence people".  While I still believe in my conclusion (that a coming exodus of Yahoo and Microsoft employees will benefit startups), I think that my experiment was flawed.  Apparently, when I set up the ad campaign, I checked a box that said "Add Social Actions to my Ad" - and guess I didn't fully understand what that meant.  That box apparently adds a Facebook picture to my ad - in this case, the picture of Yahoo and Microsoft employees who had previously joined the First Round Capital group.  I had no idea these pictures were running -- the only thing I saw in the Facebook Ad Control panel was the ad (right).  And since I'm not an employee of Microsoft and Yahoo, I never actually saw the ad running.     Anyhow, I've now been informed (loudly) that my ad which said "Leaving Yahoo?" was accompanied by a picture of a current Yahoo employee.  Most of those employees joined the FRC group before the ad campaign -- and (obviously and justifiably) were not too pleased by any implications that they were leaving their employer.  And while I've apologized in person to those that contacted me, here's a very public apology to those who haven't.  I now believe that most of the clicks on the ad were due to the surprise of seeing their colleague on the ad -- rather than an implicit statement of their desire to leave.  The email below  from one Yahoo employee sums it up much better than I can:  Earlier today, I read your post on the social ads experiment. I agree that it’s an interesting polling mechanism to judge the mood of folks at Y! or Microsoft. But I want to offer an alternate / adjunct explanation to the reason behind the rise you are seeing in CTRs. The ads are shocking.  Social ads were designed as an endorsement. By becoming a fan of a business, I lend my likeness to the business and allow them to promote their products and services to my fans. It most instances, this would have a purely positive connotation. For example, if I were a fan of BMW my likeness might appear alongside a Newsfeed ad which might read “The Ultimate Driving Machine.” The ad tagline is generally positive and straight forward. In the case of the ads you designed (attached), my face appears alongside a tagline, “Leaving Yahoo!?”.  To the casual eye, the ad tagline reads as if it could be reporting a rumor that I am leaving Yahoo!, or that I have already left and that I am recruiting for a start-up.  The negative connotation of the ad design introduces the potential to elicit responses of surprise and shock – not necessarily directly related to employee satisfaction. In fact, if the clicks on the ads are driven by “surprise and shock” it may also provide an explanation as to why the Microsoft CTRs were higher than the Yahoo CTRs. It could be that people at Microsoft were more surprised than Yahoos to see that their colleagues were leaving the mothership.  An interesting experiement in social ads and a good lesson for me about the twists and turms related to Beacon and passive endorsements. I don’t want my colleagues to think I’m leaving Yahoo, so while your experiment is ongoing, I’ve pulled my “Facebook fandom” for First Round Capital, but I very much remain a fan!  I know that your experiment was done with the best of intentions. You should keep doing them! Afterall, if we can’t be fascinated by this industry (and maintain our sense of humor) it’s time to move on.  We’re all still learning about Beacon and social ads in general. It’s a really powerful concept, but I think there we’ll discover a line between implicit and explicit endorsements.   So, here's a belated apology to all the Yahoo and Microsoft employees for their unanticipated role in my Social Advertising experiment.  I feel kindof like the guy who's girlfriend found out about their Christmas gift through Facebook beacon.  I've stopped running the ads -- and welcome back all our fans.    As people begin to deploy Social Advertising it's sure going to be interesting to think of the unanticpated consequences.  For example, assume I’m a “fan” of Nike. Nike decides to run a New Year’s Resolution promotion, with the tagline “Get in Shape This Year!” Would my friends think that I was telling them to lose weight???  Social ads sure do have social consequences... 
 Back in November, Facebook launched their new SocialAds platform.  Like many other folks, I decided to spend $50 to check out the platform.  Like Fred, I decided to advertise for my fund - First Round Capital.  Unlike Fred, however, I decided to test Facebook's targeting mechanism by running targeted ads to employees of large Internet companies -- including Yahoo and Microsoft.     One of the nice parts about Facebook's platform is their realtime statistics.  Back in November, I saw that my Yahoo ad received 21,291 impressions with only 64 clicks -- a clickthrough rate of 0.30%.  And my Microsoft ad received no clicks with 1,058 impressions. So when Microsoft announced they wanted to acquire Yahoo, it got me (and everyone else) wondering.  Specifically, I wondered if YHOO/MSFT employees were indeed more likely to "look around" for new jobs -- and if so, how much more.  Since I had baseline data from just 90 days ago, I decided to run the ads again.  On the Yahoo side, there was a 260% increase in clickthrough rate -- from 0.3% to 0.86%.  That is not surprising.  But on the Microsoft side, I was really surprised.  When I ran around 1,000 impressions before, the ad did not receive one click -- now the same advertisement received 15 clicks.  Microsoft's clickthrough rate increased from 0% to 1.19%.  Maybe it's not just Microsoft's shareholders who are unhappy.  
 When Amazon announced their Kindle last year, I bought one.  I wasn't too optimistic, as I had read a lot of bad reviews.   However, to my surprise, I've really enjoyed my Kindle experience.  The screen is extremely readable -- and while the controls are somewhat limiting, it's very easy to use.  And as long as I view the Kindle as a replacement for a book (rather than a replacement for a PC), it has surpassed my expectations.   So I'm not surprised to see today's reports that Kindle is a hit.  More importantly, I've found that I have purchased about 3 times more books using the Kindle than I otherwise would have purchased.  Surprisingly, the primary drivers of my increased purchases are due to the business model -- not the actual hardware.  Specifically:  1)  My bookshelves at home are filled with books that I never finish.  There's nothing more frustrating than buying a book, getting 20 pages into it, and then deciding that you don't like it.  Amazon's Kindle allows you to download the first few chapters of a book for free - so you can make a purchase decision after you've started to read the book.  Very cool.  I've avoided purchasing more than six books because I didn't like how they began.  2)  The average book on the Kindle costs under $10.  While it's still more you'd pay at Half.com, the instantaneous download  and low price do provide a real benefit.  I've downloaded books on trains, at airports and at hotels -- and have found that the experience is seamless and addictive.  The biggest drawback?  Reading on planes.  Use of electronic devices is prohibited during the first 20 minutes of a plane ride.  It's pretty frustrating to see everyone around you reading a book/newspaper, when your Kindle needs to be holstered. 
 A little over a year ago, I wrote a blog entry about Google's OneBox feature -- and it's potential to impact other vertical search engines.  Danny Sullivan's SearchEngineLand blog has a detailed post that shows how Google has shifted from OneBox towards Universal Search.  If you're interested in search or content discovery, Danny's post is well worth the read... 
 I see many consumer Internet pitches these days where the basic marketing strategy is to (1) get covered by Techcrunch, (2) get tens of thousands of users from the "Techcrunch Bump", and then (3) "grow virally".  While a positive Techcrunch review has the potential to send thousands of consumers your way, it does not represent a marketing plan.  Munjal Shah at Riya found this out after the launch of Riya back in 2006, when he wrote about "the cocaine like high and subsequent crash of the Techcrunch effect":  The Techcrunch article got put on Digg and read in thousands of feed readers and viola... the Techcrunch effect begins. Michael's blog is the single more effective vehicle to get the word to the online blogosphere about new technology companies on the planet..The unfortunate fact was that the initial hammering [our servers] took was just not the reality we would see later. The number of photos uploaded per hour began to fall and then stabilized near the end of the 22nd at around 25,000 photos per hour and would continue to fall for weeks to come. - Munjal Shah   So while a positive reception from the blogging community is valuable -- and can generate a lot of initial activity/interest and a nice looking Alexa chart -- it is not the only ingredient in your ultimate marketing success.  When I see a post-launch consumer Internet startup, I basically look for a few simple things:  1)  Usage Growth -- how many unique users are visiting/engaging with your site and product, and how is the rate of growth evolving over a several week period of time.  I also look at the source of this growth -- is it scalable, repeatable and systemic?  Is it event-driven (ie, PR)?  Is it organic or driven by marketing (ie, is the company buying growth via Adwords, etc)?   2)  Virality -- So many people misunderstand virality.  Virality is not "word of mouth".  And having a product go viral is not easy -- nor is it something you can just "sprinkle on a product" after creating it.  If making a product viral was as easy as adding a "share with your friends" button, there would be no reason for the $100 Billion advertising industry.  (I can see companies asking themselves -- "let's see, should we spend millions on advertising...or should we just add virality...Hmmm").  I believe a viral product is one where a consumer's basic usage of a site/product brings new users (and therefore additional utility) to the site/product.  Facebook, LinkedIn and Paypal are all great examples of viral products.  If you're pitching your business, you should know your viral coefficient.  That is, how many new users get added virally from each additional user.  And if you can get your viral coefficient greater than 1.0, then you've built something really special.    3)  Engagement Level -- Do your visitors actively engage in your site?  How long are they there for?  How many pages do they view?  What is their user experience like?  One of the easiest ways I've found to evaluate a company's engagement level is to have them (temporarily) share access to their Google Analytics account -- this gives us the ability to get the data/insight we'd need without having to bother them to run each and every report.    4)  Repeat Usage -- User retention tends to be an area where people pay the least amount of attention, but I think is one of the most important to monitor.  Specifically, how often do people come back to your site.  While there are a lot of different ways to measure retention, my preferred way is to look at a cohort analysis.  Say you've had your site running for five months -- you now have five "first month cohorts", four "second month cohorts", three "third month cohorts", two "fourth month cohorts" and one "fifth month cohort".  And you can see, what percent of your users come back in each subsequent month.  A simple chart is below.            You can also plot it out graphically -- I've attached a generic Cohort Analysis Excel document.  From this data you can learn a lot.  Not only do you see how many people are returning this month, but you can see the trends over time.  For example, in this model spreadsheet you can see that while the site is still just retaining a small percentage of their overall users, the rate of retention has gone up by over 250% over the course of the year.  And while this example cohort analysis is shown by month, immediately post-launch I'd recommend that you create and track cohorts by week.  